Authors
Sridhar Prasad
Number of Reviews
29

Title
Review for Schindler's List (1993)
    At the end of Steven Spielberg's emotionally draining masterpiece, 
one gets the true feeling of the depth of man's inhumanity, especially 
to other men.  There is a deep sense of fear and dread that follows a 
viewing of SCHINDLER'S LIST, a feeling that a viewer is about to be 
bombarded with the horror of a time long gone, yet oddly familiar.  
SCHINDLER'S LIST is one of those truly rare films which aspire to 
something more than filmed entertainment: it aspires to be something 
truly powerful, to depict something brutally horrifying and find the 
inner beauty deep inside it, somewhere.  It begs to search the souls of 
men to find the evils and the goods, and tries to explain, give some 
rationale as to man's most tragic failings.  It is a film about how men 
can fall to their most inner hatreds, and how some special men can 
overcome their many failings to emerge as intensely flawed heroes.  In a 
sense, SCHINDLER'S LIST depicts the personal journey of one man, and the 
massive journey of one race, as they both somehow interweave through the 
fates of history's most brutal massacre.  There is that deep sense of 
ominous foreboding, as if we know this story, but the brutal realities 
of it being displayed on screen disturb us, make us vomit and retch, and 
cleanse us of the inner demons which cause man to do such crimes.  And 
yet, there is a flicker, a barely noticeable candle of hope in the 
deepest despair, there is a shining example of what man can be, instead 
of what he often is.  SCHINDLER'S LIST probably probes man's fate in the 
world more than any film since possibly 2001. 
The film, on a personal level, concentrates on the remarkable story 
of Oskar Schindler (Neeson), a German businessman, a womanizer, drinker, 
chain-smoker, greedy, self-centered member of the Nazi party.  Schindler 
is lazy, conceited, and finds joy in the one thing that shall make him 
the most money: war.  He is a classic example of the "war 
profiteer".  At the start of the film, Schindler purchases an enamel 
factory, through which he wishes to make pots and pans for the German 
army, as well as armaments if necessary.  He decides to employs Jews in 
the ghettos of Poland, due to their cheap labor cost, and works with 
Jewish accountant Itzhak Stern (Kingsley) to find Jewish partners to 
gain investors and make his supplies.  Stern comes up with the ingenious 
idea to save those who have no "essential" skills: teachers, 
musiciens, rabbis, and the handicapped, and labels them as 
"essential workers", allowing them to work in Schindler's 
factory.  During the film's middle portion, Spielberg shifts his focus 
from Schindler to the Holocaust in general, and in particular to 
Commandant Amon Goeth (Fiennes), who is in charge of the ghetto, and 
later moves all the Jews to a forced labor camp.  Schindler becomes 
close friends with Goeth in order to have his factory run even within 
the walls of the camp, but he slowly sees the monstrosities committed by 
the Nazis to his workers, and to others.
During moments of the second act, Spielberg focuses on children.  
There are unforgettable moments of power when Spielberg shows the 
inhumane cruelty suffered by innocent children, and the changes that 
happen to these little boys and girls, no older than 10 or 11.  
Spielberg has often been accused of oversentimentality: there is one 
portion, when he colors the coat of a girl as she is walking through the 
ghetto, intercutting with Schindler watching her.  It can be said that 
this is a "Spielbergian" touch of audience manipulation.  
However, Spielberg isn't looking for that: he is demonstrating, in 
frightening terms, the intensenly personal effects of the Holocaust.  So 
often, 11 million people are reduced to a number.  Spielberg is able to 
cast every single one of those 11 million people, including the millions 
of children, into real people in one devastating shot where the red coat 
is on a conveyer belt full of dead bodies.  It is a stunning example of 
how truly atrocious this time period was.
The third act is where Schindler creates his list.  The flawed war 
profiteer has chosen to stop the madness that has been unjustly going 
on.  He spends his entire fortune, bankrupts himself, and literally 
purchases 1000 lives from Goeth.  He takes these 1000 people away from 
the death camps, and puts them to work in his factory, saving them from 
the horrors that were to happen to them.  Kingsley delivers history's 
judgement of Oskar Schindler in a moving scene: "He who saves one 
life, saves the world entire."  It is a touching moment in a film 
full of intensely touching moments.  By this time, the audience has been 
purely devastated in immense heartache: there is no more that can be 
done to further impact a viewer.
When SCHINDLER'S LIST was profiled on AFI's top 100 list, the 
reviewer said that SCHINDLER'S LIST was able to capture death more 
realistically than anything ever before seen.  Death is so realistic 
that it touches the viewer dramatically.  Surely, the brilliant decision 
to film in black and white is a reason, and for that Spielberg and 
Janusz Kaminski have to be thanked.  It is a stunning example of 
cinematography never before experienced on screen.  The script, by 
Hollywood's premier writer of serious fare, is ingenious, deftly mixing 
in humor at times to give the audience the further impression that this 
was real, that this actually happened.  John Williams turns in his most 
moving and haunting score, with sounds that are simply breathtaking.  
The repeating melody is as tragic and somber as anything ever before 
composed.
The perfomances are downright exquisite.  Neeson makes his career 
with a stunning performance that lifts him into the stratosphere of 
great actors.  Kingsley is absolutely magnificent, but the true 
discovery is Ralph Fiennes's dramatically scary turn as Amon Goeth.  
This is one cold-hearted killer, with a complicated, twisted 
personality.  Fiennes is so scary that I still have nightmares of Amon 
Goeth, coming with his gun to shoot me in the snow, make my blood just 
sink into the white surface, like ink spilled on a page.  It is one of 
the century's most horribly frightening, disgustingly repulsing, truly 
brilliant performances. 
SCHINDLER'S LIST is as raw, as punishing, as brilliant, and as 
hopeful as film has ever been on screen.  It is a brutal example of what 
film can do, pushed to its highest limits and taken to its most extreme 
bounds.  It is without a doubt Steven Spielberg's greatest acheivement, 
and one of the greatest films of all time.  Remarkably clear, poignantly 
devastating, and lovingly portrayed by a filmmaker who knows the true 
power of his art, SCHINDLER'S LIST is the best film is a generation, and 
one of the most inspired pieces of art in history.  Magnificent.

Title
Review for Manhattan Murder Mystery (1993)
    One of the craziest movies ever filmed, Woody Allen's MANHATTAN 
MURDER MYSTERY is the director's response to the scandals that plagued 
him at the time of its release.  The film, which was shot while Allen 
was in his personal problems, is ironically enough one of the loosest, 
freshest, and looniest films Allen has ever made.  It is not an artistic 
triumph, or a groundbreaking effort by an accomplished director.  It 
isn't even a heavily decorated film, worthy of several honors.  It is, 
however, a hilarious comedy that works 90% of the time, and has enough 
to get the viewer through the other 10%.
Larry and Carol Lipton (Allen and Keaton) are a couple living in 
Manhattan, who one night happen to have a drink with the neighbors next 
door, Paul and Lillian House (Adler and Lynn Cohen).  The next day, the 
Liptons come back from the opera to see that Lillian House has had a 
heart attack, and died.  They are in slight grief, until Carol starts 
noticing that Paul is too "perky" for a widower.  She and family friend 
Ted (Alda), who happens to be a recent divorcee that is also in love 
with Carol, start investigating the life of Paul House, with Larry 
growing increasingly scared of his wife.  Soon after, Carol draws writer 
Marcia Fox (Huston), a client of book editor Larry into the mix as well. 
 The whole thing ends in a preposterous ending, with crazy plot twist 
after plot twist.
The film is quite erratic.  It works best when it sticks to the 
basic story of these people, who are absolutely neurotic, and their 
fascination with this elderly man, who seems to be very, very nice.  
When it doesn't work is when Allen feels the need to be serious and 
explore human relationships.  Sure, the flirting between Ted, Carol, 
Larry, and Marcia is funny, but does it have to go to the point where 
couples have to break up?  Whatever happened to comedy?  One wishes that 
Allen wasn't so serious, in that he wouldn't have to make something so 
refreshingly light seem so serious when Carol threatens to leave Larry 
for good.  Allen could have stopped at the painfully funny scenes of the 
couple yelling at each other over their flirtations.
The comedic sequences, which comprises the vast majority of the 
film, are downright hysterical.  There are so many funny scenes in this 
movie I can't even count them all.  It's written beautifully, with Allen 
providing enough lines in all the conversations that are just too much.  
This is a very talky film, but so much of it is hilarious that I don't 
really care.  Everything unfolds quite nicely until the end, when 
Allen's relationships begin to falter.  Until that, this is a funny, 
light, sometimes morbid piece that truly does work.  What pushes it 
along are the performances, all of which are exquisite.  Keaton is 
marvelous, and a tad more neurotic than the bumbling Allen, who plays 
the role he has defined again.  Alda is truly hysterical, and Huston 
shows up with just enough exotic panache to add even more insanity to 
this piece.  These are four incredibly screwed up people, people that 
are just too much. 
In the end, the whole thing is a little too much.  It's got a little 
too much preposterous insanity, especially with the ridiculously staged 
ending, which is nevertheless damned funny, as is the film.  Is it 
erratic and uneven?  Yeah, probably.  But it's still got so many comedic 
touches that I couldn't help but smile.  It's a light farcical spoof on 
sleuth movies, and it works so much that the end can be forgiven, as can 
Allen's serious touches.  Ignore that stuff, and you have a very 
entertaining, very amusing film for all ages, something Woody Allen 
hadn't produced in a while.  For all its eccentricities, MANHATTAN 
MURDER MYSTERY gave me a smile from ear to ear.

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
    One of the most stunning pictures of 1997, "GOOD WILL HUNTING"
emerged from winter season as one of the best films of the year, and a
blockbuster hit for Miramax.  Featuring a hip, young cast, and a
wonderful role by Robin Williams, "GWH" was rewarded with 2 Oscar
victories, including Best Original Screenplay, and Best Supporting
Actor, for Williams.
The plot is relatively simple and straightforward.  Will Hunting
(Damon) is the classic definition of a rebel.  Born and raised in
South Boston by foster parents, Will is a fighter, a kid of the
streets, who gets into fights without being asked, who bums around
bars with his friends, having a few drinks between jobs.  Will is also
a genius.  His mind is brilliant, and he has the education of a
Harvard student, without the degree.
His secret is discovered when one day, he is caught by Professor
Gerald Lambeau (Skaarsgard) while working on a complex Fourier system
Lambeau had put up on a blackboard as a challenge to his students.
Lambeau immediately "rescues" the boy from an impeding jail term, and
takes him to a number of therapists to heal his mind.  Finally, he
asks college roommate Sean McGuire (Williams), himself a Southie as
well, to help the boy.  What follows is a journey for Will and Sean,
as both grow closer during the sessions.  The story also deals with
Will's development, his love for Skylar (Driver), and his complicated
friendship with Chuckie (Affleck).
The screenplay is riddled with old movie cliches, and is as
predictable as any other.  What sets "GOOD WILL HUNTING" apart,
however, is the direction of Gus Van Sant, as well as the acting of
the principal roles.  Van Sant uses all sorts of angles and lighting
to acheive brilliant technical shots while drawing the audience into
the story.  While the story may be flawed, the dialogue certainly
isn't.  Damon and Affleck wrote an endearing script, one which rewards
excellent performances with great pieces of dialogue, and fantastic
set pieces.
The performances are nothing short of exquisite.  Damon and
Affleck are wonderful, absolutely wonderful.  Driver is sweet and
touching, and Skaarsgard is as good as ever.  But the film belongs to
Williams' tortured performance as McGuire.  It is his story that is
told as well, his change from sorrow to relief.  The script tracks a
parallel story in Sean McGuire's, and Williams pours more into this
performance than any other in recent memory.  Damon is nothing short
of outstanding in his lead role, but Williams just steals every shot
he has.  With a wonderful score and a gorgeous ending, this film is
certainly one of the finest of 1997, and a stunning debut for
screenwriters Damon and Affleck.

Title
Review for Forrest Gump (1994)
    Midway through FORREST GUMP, I realized how much I loved watching 
Tom Hanks act.  This, for all the dazzling array of special effects 
(that are starting to look dated every time I watch this), is a movie 
driven by the wondrous Hanks, who gives perhaps the most indelible 
American performance in the last 20 years.  I honestly don't know if 
there is a better actor alive than Tom Hanks.  Hanks is destined to be 
mocked more than Marlon Brando's creation of Vito Corleone for THE 
GODFATHER, because his performance is so good.  It is impossible to say 
what it feels like to watch Tom Hanks on screen, using every bit of his 
immense talent to bring a character to life, to catch the sympathy of 
the audience with just one line, one mannerism, one something, to make 
us feel.  As Andrew Beckett in PHILADELPHIA, Jim Lovell in APOLLO 13, 
and Capt. Miller in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, Hanks was able to do the exact 
same thing: give commanding performances that dominate the movie.
That said, the movie is a winner by all standards.  The plot is 
relatively simple: an Alabama man named Forrest Gump (Hanks), who has an 
IQ of 75 (below normal), goes through life, somehow meeting great 
people, and acheiving great things.  The movie is dominated by his love 
for Jenny (Wright), who takes a different turn than he does, but winds 
up in the same place.  Along the way, he meets lifelong friends that he 
manages to turn around.
FORREST GUMP was able to acheive all of its magic through great 
effects, although they are starting to wear thin.  What doesn't wear 
thin are the simply marvelous performances.  Gary Sinise, in one of the 
most beautifully constructed supporting roles in history, gives an 
astounding, career-making performance as Lt. Dan, one of Forrest's 
closest friends.  Sinise probably has the most difficult role in the 
film, but manages to make it his own through a powerful performance 
which contains the frustrations of every veteran on the face of the 
Earth.  Robin Wright, whose role is also more difficult than Hanks', is 
also great as Jenny, the girl of Forrest's dreams.  Her performance is 
that of lost innocence, of someone who missed the boat early on, and 
never got back on track until late.  Sally Field also shows up for a 
fine turn as Forrest's mother. 
The one immense strength of FORREST GUMP is its inflappable star.  I 
don't understand how Tom Hanks is so good: he just is.  Hanks' role is 
not the most difficult.  However, it is a lot harder than it looks.  
Hanks adds so much more to the character than isn't there.  The 
mannerisms, the certain tendencies, and the flawless portrayal of a man 
who is so simple than he could be mistaken for dumb.  Hanks turns a role 
that isn't so difficult, and does the absolute best he can with it, 
turning it into an indelible performance worth seeing time and again.  
There is no reason why I wouldn't see Tom Hanks act.
FORREST GUMP does fall when it comes to its message.  There are 
moments of absolute hilarity and purely bad filmmaking, at times (when 
Forrest learns how to run...eegh').  The film also has a tendency to 
really make fun of the stupid, which is a shame.  More enigmatic is the 
film's political message.  A film about so many events must have a 
message.  If there is one, its that goodness will prevail, but much of 
the film is awfully contrived, like the ridiculous 'running around 
the country' episode.   The film is not for radicalism, but neither 
for the 50's ideals.  It wants to fall in the middle, but it can't.
As a piece of entertainment, however, FORREST GUMP is unbeatable.  A 
mulitple Oscar-winner, it is arguable whether or not is should have 
beaten PULP FICTION, but no one can deny its emotional thump, especially 
towards the end.  A tour-de-force not for director Zemeckis, who made a 
great but not superb film, but for Hanks, who delivers the decade's most 
unforgettable performance.  Everything in this movie emanates from Tom 
Hanks, and there's nothing wrong with that.  Hanks' performance and 
character are so much a part of American film, that FORREST GUMP works 
better as a cultural phenomenon than as a movie.  No matter.  It's still 
a great film, and an opportunity to see this generation's Jimmy Stewart 
in fine form.  One of the essential Tom Hanks movies, and that says a 
lot.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
    Steven Spielberg's second epic film on World War II is an 
unquestioned masterpiece of film.  Spielberg, ever the student on film, 
has managed to resurrect the war genre by producing one of its 
grittiest, and most powerful entries.  He also managed to cast this 
era's greatest answer to Jimmy Stewart, Tom Hanks, who delivers a 
performance that is nothing short of an astonishing miracle.
For about 160 out of its 170 minutes, "Saving Private Ryan" is 
flawless.  Literally.  The plot is simple enough.  After the epic D-Day 
invasion (whose sequences are nothing short of spectacular), Capt. John 
Miller (Hanks) and his team are forced to search for a Pvt. James Ryan 
(Damon), whose brothers have all died in battle.  Once they find him, 
they are to bring him back for immediate discharge so that he can go 
home.  Accompanying Miller are his crew, played with astonishing 
perfection by a group of character actors that are simply sensational.  
Barry Pepper, Adam Goldberg, Vin Diesel, Giovanni Ribisi, Davies, and 
Burns are the team sent to find one man, and bring him home.
The battle sequences that bookend the film are extraordinary.  
Literally.  There is nothing in film that has ever been recorded that 
will prepare you for the sheer onslaught of terrorizing violence in the 
film's first 20 minutes.  Spielberg films almost the entire movie 
without music, leaving it up to the characters to generate emotion, and 
they do to perfection.  The sequences in France, all of them, beginning 
with the battle and ending with the battle, are fabulous, especially the 
dialogues between the men as they walk through the hills and 
countrysides, trying to save Private Ryan.
There are no words I can use to describe the true horror and power 
of these sequences.  This is what Coppola was looking for in "Apocalypse 
Now", but couldn't create.  The sheer horror of these sequences all but 
condemn war.  The performance by Hanks as the leader of this gang is 
also extraordinary.  He is head and shoulders above of the rest of the 
actors in the world, with his comic timing, dramatic flair, his quiet 
emotion that stirs an entire nation to tears.  Hanks is this country's 
finest actor, and he proves it here.
However, Spielberg almost destroys his own masterpiece.  With a 
chance to make it the one of the greatest films of all time, Spielberg 
creates 10 minutes of purely worthless film.  The sequence involving 
Army Chief-of-Stafff George Marshall and Mrs. Ryan is decent, but 
doesn't hold up to the rest of the film, relying on wartime cliches to 
power it.  But that is forgivable.  What isn't is the bookends of the 
film, the cemetary sequences.  The first one is quite good, a decent 
introduction into the lives of these men.  The last sequence is 
atrocious.  The forced emotion, accompanied by a ridiculous piece of 
music, is simply horrible compared to the rest of the magical film.  
These flaws are what downgrade "Ryan" from the greatest film of our era, 
to the greatest war film of our era.  Spielberg should have trusted his 
own material, and he should have trusted Hanks to deliver the most 
chilling line of the movie, to end his masterpiece right there.  The use 
of the flag, though patriotic, is in contrast to the movie's theme.  The 
power of the bulk of the film, however, is astonishing.  Spielberg has 
truly made a wondrous work of art, that persists even after first 
viewing of the film, is extraordinary.  This is the film of the year.

Title
Review for Earth (1998)
EARTH
A film by Deepa Mehta
Starring: Aamir Khan, Nandita Das, and Rahul Khanna
Written by Deepa Mehta
Based on the book "Cracking India" by Bapsi Sidhwa
In Hindi, Urdu, Parsi, and Punjabi, with English subtitles
    Early on in Deepa Mehta's fourth feature film "Earth", the viewer
quickly gets a sense of the dichotomy between the serious and the humorous,
and the disastrous complications that the combination of the two can have
when a little child is listening to a discussion about the partition of
India, controlled by the British Empire, into two separate nations, India,
dominated by Hindus, and Pakistan, dominated by Muslims.  There is a quiet
sense of foreboding within any historical film about what will happen next,
and "Earth" is no exception.  History cannot be changed with an event as
catastrophic as the partition of India, where millions of people died in the
greatest migration of people in history.
    Mehta cannot ignore that, yet she makes a curious decision that provides
mixed results in making her narrator a naďve young child named Lenny (Maia
Sethna).  Lenny's Hindu nanny Shanta (Das) takes Lenny around the streets of
Lahore before partition.  They become part of a group of friends, who
include Hasan the Muslim masseur (Khanna), Sher Singh the Sikh (Gulshan
Grover), Muslim Imam Din (Khalbushan Khalbanda), and Muslim Dil Nawaz
(Khan), the Ice Candy Man.  These group of friends endlessly debate religion
and politics along with the effects that partition will have on that area.
    During the course of the film, we find that most of this group is trying
to pursue Shanta, the main suitors being Dil Nawaz and Hasan.  We also see
all of this through the eyes of a child who is losing her best friend to one
of these men.  This story is set against the backdrop of an India about to
split into two pieces, both of which will be forever damned into hatred.
Both suitors are initially peace loving, rational people who urge their
friends to stick together despite the religious turmoil that is boiling in
Lahore, the setting of the story (and the present day capital of Pakistan).
We see the love between Hasan and Shanta bloom, but the story takes a sharp
turn into the surreal when Dil Nawaz, played by the loveable, affable Indian
superstar Aamir Khan, finds that his sisters have been slaughtered, along
with hundreds of other Muslims, on a train from India to Pakistan.
    It is here that the narrative turns into the serious tragedy that the
story is fated to have.  Certainly, Lenny plays a part in this.  She crudely
asks Dil Nawaz if he saw his sisters in the train dead, not realizing the
power of her words.  She is unable to see his transition into a cold,
heartless man who is filled with hate and revenge.  She is still the naďve
young girl, stuck in a world which is increasingly violent.  Mehta makes her
greatest claim for peace through the eyes of this young girl who is fated to
be shattered by the end of this story.
    After partition and independence, riots and violence explodes throughout
Lahore, and Mehta is unflinching in showing the sheer totality of
destruction that religion and nationalism can have.  The portrait of the
world becomes bleak and depressing because modern day viewers know that the
situation never goes back to normal: it is still bleak and depressing.
    Mehta's filmmaking is sometimes shaky, and her pacing is uneven, but her
greatest power is to let the actors do their own jobs.  The film works
mostly because of two mammoth performances.  As Shanta, Das is superb,
showing the love she feels for Hasan, the affection for Dil Nawaz, and the
incredulousness of a bystander whose beloved city is being destroyed.  The
true revelation, however, is Khan, who is absolutely astonishing.  He
cements his reputation as one of India's greatest actors with his brutally
honest performance of a young man who is kind, generous, and affable, but
also a man who is forced into a life of rage and revenge.  Khan is not the
main character in the story, but he is an engaging, fiercely dominating
screen presence, overshadowing everyone else on screen and becoming, in
essence, the face of hate.  Khan is both engaging, funny, romantic,
vengeful, and cold all within the same movie, and his transition is nothing
but genius.  Mehta's greatest accomplishment is personalizing hate into the
face of Khan, and the effect is devastating.
    Former MTV VJ Khanna is good as Hasan, but is mostly a bystander and has
mostly a static job.  He does well with it, however, and makes a promising
debut as an actor.  The supporting performances are uniformly outstanding,
highlighting a unique cast which is supremely talented in bringing this
story to screen.  Mehta has a superb talent for shooting her films, and this
is no exception: she paints beautiful landscapes of Lahore, with gorgeous
renderings of 1947.  The other critical component for success is the superb
score by A.R. Rahman, India's foremost music composer, who writes a gorgeous
and searing score, all combining for a flawed but ultimately stunning film
that sears at the soul long after the film is over.  "Earth" is not a
perfect film, but it is a great one, and it deserves to be seen, recognized,
and mulled over for years to come.  This is a terrific accomplishment.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Starring Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Harry Shearer, Maria =
Pitillo, and Doug Savant
Written by Dean Deviln and Roland Emmerich.  Produced by Dean Devlin
    GODZILLA shouldn't be this much fun.  After showing what to do right 
with a cheesy disaster movie in the incredibly entertaining INDEPENDENCE 
DAY of 1996, Emmerich and Devlin do everything wrong in this motion 
picture.  Without a doubt the most cliched, hackneyed picture made by 
Hollywood in recent memory, Godzilla has one of the worst scripts I have 
ever seen.  The dialogue is garbage, the characters are under-written, 
the acting performances are pathetic, and the music is unbelievably bad. 
 Yet, I guarantee you that Godzilla will be one of the most enjoyable 
movies you have ever seen. 
    Remember that 45 minute lead-in to the aliens in ID4?  Forget it.  
Devlin and Emmerich are out to get the monster shown in a hurry, and 
they do.  By the time the credits are over, you see the destructive 
power of Godzilla.  Within 30 minutes, Devlin and Emmerich show you the 
beast.  A mix between an iguana, a crocodile, and a T-Rex, he does look 
good.  The animation is smooth, if horrible at certain times, and the 
night sequences are particularly fantastic.  Emmerich's talents with 
quick cuts and sharp turns make these portions a delight, especially 
helicopter chases that go around searching for the monster. 
    Unfortunately, it's the portions bookending the monster sequences 
that are absolutely dreadful.  Matthew Broderick does his best as Nick 
Tatopoulus, an expert on radiation effects, but he isn't helped much by 
this awful script nor by the other actors.  Maria Pitillo is atrocious 
as Broderick's long-lost love, a perfect ditz who can't get anything 
right.  Hank Azaria is as wonderful as ever, but he is so underused we 
never get a chance to really know him.  Only Jean Reno has the most 
impact: as a mysterious Frenchman, he is a wild and crazy delight, a 
cross between Jeff Goldblum and Brent Spiner's characters in ID4. 
    After a particularly good 40 mins, the movie settles into a 60 
minute holding pattern that is mildly enjoyable at its best, and 
downright tedious at its worst.  The CGI graphics are outstanding, and 
the movements of the monster are fabulous, but sooner or later, you get 
tired of seeing the same old scenes over and over again.  Savant is OK 
as O'Neil, a big and important soldier, but he's not used much either, 
and wasted like the rest of the cast.  Cliches abound, and the jokes are 
painfully stale. 
    However, it is the last 40 minutes that saves Godzilla.  This movie 
resembles last year's Memorial Day blockbuster, The Lost World, in that 
both are mediocre.  However, Devlin and Emmerich saved their best for 
last, which is what Spielberg should have done.  When Broderick and Reno 
go hunting for Godzilla's nest (that's right, he's pregnant--just watch 
the commercials!), they find 200 eggs, all of which hatch into little 
baby 'Zillas, each of whom are about 5-6 feet tall.  Imagine lizard 
velociraptors.  What happens is some frighteningly fun sequences with 
200 monsters and 4 people in a closed up Madison Square Garden.  Have we 
seen this before?  Sure.  Jurassic Park did it better before Godzilla, 
the remake, was even thought of.  But damned if its not fun.  The 
sequences are gems because they provide some action.  Quick cuts and 
stale jokes here help, because they are so lighteningly paced that we 
actually laugh. 
    The real fun comes at the end, with an elaborate chase scene.  
Again, everything from this movie is derivative.  From the music to the 
monsters, we've seen all of this before in far better movies.  But 
that's the point.  Devlin and Emmerich set out to make a modern-day, 
B-movie monster movie with an enormous budget.  That they succeeded 
proves that you don't need a script to make a movie fun; you just need a 
lot of money.  Godzilla shouidn't be this much fun.  We should hate it 
because it is everything we abhor about the movie industry.  But inside 
that movie theater, it certainly can be captivating.  This is not a good 
movie; its just a damn fun bad one.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
    WHEW!  Summer blockbusters don't get much bigger than ARMAGEDDON, a 
2 hour 30 minute ride through outer space.  You think Godzilla was big?  
Or Deep Impact?  Forget a creature as big as the Empire State Building, 
forget a comet the size of NYC, ARMAGEDDON's got a big asteroid the size 
of Texas hurtling its way here within two weeks.  In that time, the US 
government recruits, trains, and launches the world's best oil-rig 
drillers to save the planet?
    Farfetched?  ARMAGEDDON makes the THE X-FILES seem like a docudrama. 
 But that's not the point.  Michael Bay and Jerry Bruckheimer are in the 
business of making classic popcorn movies, movies that are completely 
enjoyable and forgettable.  In that sense, they succeed.  There isn't 
much of a plot, simply because Tyler and Affleck don't carry the same 
kind of chemistry needed to produce a decent subplot.  Willis is as 
macho as ever as Harry Stamper, the leader of this rag-tag crew that's 
going to save the planet.  The movie flows with testosterone, and is 
filled with macho, big-bang explosions and meteors clobbering the earth. 
    While it's fun, and while the movie is rapid, there's one huge 
problem: overkill.  Bay and Bruckheimer want to top everything.  
Literally.  So they constructed a movie almost 3 hours long filled with 
explosions.  The one problem is overkill.  Bay and Bruckheimer fail to 
stop: they just keep on going, making the film one endless explosion 
after another.  The plot's predictable, and the movie starts to lose 
steam in the middle.  During the space sequences, bad lighting mixed 
with Bay's frenetic editing makes about a good 30 minutes of the movie 
almost incoherent, with running cameras on blurred images.  Explosion 
after explosion rock the movie, as nothing goes right for our fearless 
warriors.  Bay and Bruckheimer failed to ease up on the craziness, 
expecting the audience to get emotionally attached, so that they would 
feel the highs and lows. 
    That's not easy to do with the poor characterization.  The only fun 
from this crew comes from Affleck and Buscemi, who have the best lines 
in the movie.  Still, there's no denying ARMAGEDDON isn't fun.  It has 
its moments, and there's a lot to like in this film.  It's not smart 
entertainment, it relies on sheer overpowering to carry its viewers, and 
there are a lot of really neat sequences.  You just leave with a feeling 
of disappointment, because there's TOO much to like.  The action is 
brain-numbing, so that the last hour goes by in a blur.  It's an 
enjoyable ride, but Bay, who tames his frenetic touch in the beginning, 
restarts it again at the end, causing the film to be a big collage of 
fast-paced images.  The film is just too long, and too big for its own 
good.  It's a fun ride, but in the end, it's just too big.  There's too 
much in this film to be truly effective.  If about a half-hour was cut 
from this film, it would be a lot easier to take.
    Overall, although an enjoyable blockbuster that's ten times better 
than Godzilla, ARMAGEDDON just isn't good enough.  THE X-FILES and THE 
TRUMAN SHOW were better films, and more enjoyable.  Maybe it's because 
they were shorter?

Title
Review for Casablanca (1942)
Starring Humphrey Bogart, Ingrid Bergman, and Claude Rains
    By now, this movie has transcended even film itself.  I was a late =
bloomer: it was a long time until I saw Casablanca.  Too bad, because =
when it was all said and done, I thought this really was the beginning =
of a beautiful friendship.  If you are one of those extremely rare =
people who have never seen this gorgeously amazing film, go right now =
and rent it.  Then watch it again.  And again.  And again.  It's that =
good. =20
    This, simply, is the best romance Hollywood has ever concocted.  It =
just might be the best picture Hollywood has ever made.  Alright, =
alright, I'm jumping ahead of myself.  Let's start at the beginning.  =
Rick Blaine (Humphrey Bogart) is a bar owner in Casablanca, a travel =
town in Morocco during WWII.  It is controlled by the Vichy French =
Government, but Rick is usually given a free hand to do what he pleases. =
 No one knows what fully goes on in Rick's place but Rick himself, as =
visas are sold, bribes are issued, and a whole host of other things go =
on.  It is a normal night, with many many people trying to flee =
Casablanca to America.  The plot centers around one of these people: =
Victor Laszlo, a French Resistance leader.  He and his wife Elsa =
(Bergman) come to Casablanca to seek visas to America. =20
    The catch?  Elsa is an old flame of Rick.  She used to date him, and =
they frequented a bar with a black piano player named Sam (the =
incomparable Dooley Wilson), who came with Rick to set up shop in =
Casablanca.  Elsa dumped Rick on a rainy night in Paris, and Rick's =
heart has been stone-cold ever since.  Rick holds two visas with him =
that could save the lives of the Laszlos, but he waits, for he feels he =
shouldn't give them to Laszlo at any price.  Finally, after the pleas of =
Elsa, Rick concocts a plan to get her out of the country.
    Bogart and Bergman are simply fabulous in their respective roles.  =
Claude Rains playes police captain Louis Renault to absolute perfection. =
 He is marvelously hilarious, sharing some memorable scenes with Bogart, =
especially the final scene.  The direction is subtly perfect by Curtiz, =
and everything comes together marvelously.  Nothing in this film goes =
wrong, and if it does, who cares?  For all the inconsistencies in the =
script (fog in Morocco?  visas that can't be rejected by the Nazis?), =
the lines are so good that they make up for it.  "Play it again, Sam". =
That's what we want most of all.  After all, "a kiss is just a =
kiss....as time goes by".  The script ends up to be marvelous.  This is =
as close to flawless as Hollywood will ever get. =20
    How can you argue with Bogie?  You can't.  Watch Casablanca again.  =
It'll be the start of a beautiful friendship.
RATING (out of 4): ****
(2nd best movie I've ever seen (only to the Godfather))

Title
Review for Age of Innocence, The (1993)
THE AGE OF INNOCENCE
A film by Martin Scorsese
Starring: Daniel Day-Lewis, Winona Ryder, and Michelle Pfeiffer
Written by Jay Cocks and Martin Scorsese
Based on the novel by Edith Wharton
    Martin Scorsese's triumphant adaptation of Edith Wharton's THE AGE 
OF INNOCENCE is a stunning film for the quintessential New York 
filmmaker, the man who brought the streets of TAXI DRIVER and MEAN 
STREETS to life.  It seems like an odd choice for Scorsese to do a 
period piece in the early 1900's, but the fact that he pulls it off so 
brilliantly is a wonder, and a testament to the greatness of Scorsese as 
a filmmaker.  This is a gorgeous visual experience that it surely one of 
Scorsese's finest.
Newland Archer (Day-Lewis) is a prestigious lawyer who is engaged to 
May Welland (Ryder), a somewhat empty and shallow New Yorker, who 
belongs to a prestigious family and is quite beautiful.  The marriage is 
one which will unite two very prestigious families, in a society where 
nothing is more important than the opinions of others.  On the day that 
Archer is to announce his engagement to May, Countess Ellen Olenska 
(Pfeiffer), cousin of May, walks into Archer's life.  Archer is 
immediately captivated, and finds himself in love with Ellen.  Archer is 
also bound by the limits of New York society, which is an intrusive as 
any other in the world.  Archer finds himself having a secret love 
affair in his mind with Countess Olenska, attempting to keep her in his 
mind while trying not to lose his social status. 
The film's subject matter may seem alien to Scorsese, but the theme 
is definitely not.  It is a theme of forbidden romance, guilty 
pleasures, and the consequences causes because of those actions.  There 
is a painstakingly flawed hero, and his choice between the life he 
wants, and the life he is destined for.  In truth, it is a film about a 
society the audience doesn't know about, but wants to find out more, 
much like the society of GOODFELLAS or even KUNDUN. 
The performances are absolutely breathtaking.  Day-Lewis portrays 
more mental anguish in his face than one man should be forced to take.  
Pfeiffer is marvelous as Countess Olenska, a mix of passion and beauty 
that the audience would die for as well.  Ryder is probably the gem of 
the group, for it is her quiet presence that overwhelms the plot, and 
slowly pushes Day-Lewis closer and closer to his eventual ending.  The 
supporting cast is also wonderful, with several characters so singular 
that they are indelible in one's memory.
Scorsese definitely has a passion for filmmaking.  His lavish and 
sumptuous set design and marvelous recreation of New York is a wondrous 
sight.  He literally transports the viewer to another world with 
incredible imagery.  His script is also excellent, slow in buildup, with 
a rapid conclusion and a fantastic ending that has to be seen to be 
believed.  It is difficult to make a period piece gripping: Scorsese, 
however, does it beautifully.  The famous cameras of the legendary 
director are also everywhere.  He is patient, but he films everything 
and anything remotely important.  The cameras sweep, pan, track, and do 
more than they've ever done, but they are so subtle, one doesn't realize 
he's watching all the Scorsese hallmarks until a 2nd viewing.  The 
central tracking shot is probably longer and more complex than the 
famous GOODFELLAS shot, but the viewer doesn't notice it, because we 
want to see more of this gorgeous world.  There are a few deft touches 
of filmmaking that are simply outstanding, and Joanne Woodward' 
narration is exquisite.  Not a fast film like GOODFELLAS, this shares 
more in common with KUNDUN than anything else.  And like KUNDUN, this is 
a slow-starting film that truly shines, when given the chance to fully 
breathe and bloom in the end.  A beautiful film by a director continuing 
to challenge himself year after year. 

Title
Review for From Russia with Love (1963)
    FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE, the 2nd entry in the James Bond series, is 
still the definitive Sean Connery as Bond film, and, except for possibly 
GOLDFINGER, the finest film in the series.  A fast-paced, intelligent, 
witty, and suspenseful film, FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE is a magnificent 
entry in the espionage film genre, and a film that just isn't made today 
anymore.
The plot is relatively simple, and quite deceptive.  Bond isn't 
looking to save the world, or prevent nuclear holocaust.  Instead, the 
object in question is a coding maching: a Lecter, the machine the 
Soviets use for all their secret transmissions.  Former KGB agent Rosa 
Klebb (Lotte Lenya) and 5 (Vladek Sheybal), two agents now working 
for SPECTRE, are trying to obtain a Russian coding device to conduct 
criminal operations.  They decide to use British agent James Bond (Sean 
Connery) to obtain the device from Russian cipher clerk Tatiana Romanova 
(Daniela Bianchi).  Romanova is hired by Klebb, acting as a KGB agent, 
to fake a defection and seduce Bond in order to eliminate him.  Once 
Bond has the machine, SPECTRE agent Red Grant (Robert Shaw) is to kill 
Bond, the girl, and take the coding device.  Bond suspects a trap from 
the beginning, but he can't resist the opportunity to get a Lecter, and 
to meet Tatiana.  Once there, he successfully gets the Lecter (and 
romances the girl), before having a memorable train ride with Robert 
Shaw's Grant.
FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE is where so many of the trademark 
characteristics of a Bond film became set in stone.  John Barry's theme 
reappears constantly.  The action set-piece before the film's credits is 
also introduced for the first time.  The viewers also get a glimpse of Q 
(Desmond Llewelyn) for the first time, as he devises his very first 
gadget: a briefcase.  The film is also the last to not have the 
excessive gadgetry that have plagued recent Bond films.  The script, 
instead of having outrageously sexist one-liners and pathetic attempts 
at campy humor, is instead more formal, more serious, with emphasis not 
on humor but on the business at hand.  Yet, there is enough of the camp 
element to make the film more than action-entertaining: James Bond is 
also, besides the world's best spy, a downright misogynist dinosaur, and 
FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE introduces that subtlely, a trait later Bond films 
forget.
The strength lies in the performances.  Everyone's fantastic, from 
Bianchi, to the excellent Shaw, to Lenya, who gives a marvelous turn as 
Klebb.  Shaw, who would experience his massive burst of fame 12 years 
later in Steven Spielberg's JAWS, is nevertheless quite good in his 
relatively simple role as the psychotic killer.  Lenya is a riot at 
Klebb, who is magnificently portrayed as the man-hater who manages to 
get things done.  The supporting cast, especially the players in 
Istanbul, do a fine job, especially Armendariz as Karim Bey.  There are 
many extravagant set-pieces (the Gypsys, the train, and more...), but 
the film doesn't feel overly stunt-conscious: it is more on the 
cat-and-mouse game played by three sides.
FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE, howver, belongs to Sean Connery.  He 
establishes his persona as the coolest human being on the planet with a 
magnificent mix of panache, humor, and cold-hearted boldness.  One of 
the finest scenes is when Bond is carefully checking his room for 
'bugs'.  With the Bond theme roaring in the background, Connery 
calmly checks his room with a cool sense of calm, with an indelible 
strut and manner.  It is this overwhelming sense of intelligence mixed 
with panache and sheer guts that makes Bond such a phenomenal character. 
 Connery is simply stellar: it is simply a seminal performance, with 
enough humor and enough hard-edged toughness to make it magical.
This is one of those great espionage thrillers that focuses on the 
actual spying part.  There are no fierce explosions, or anything of the 
kind.  FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE is so good because it actually could have 
happened: this is the stuff spies really do.  There are no overwhelming 
gadgets or toys that the agents use, except their heads.  Bond is so 
much smarter in this film than the later attempts, especially the 
dreadful Roger Moore era.  It is a harder edged film, with a simple, yet 
fast and intelligent plot that relies on conversations, multiple 
characters, and cat-and-mouse games of surveillance, 'bugging', 
and anticipation.  The train scene is the true spectacle: its a stellar 
game of classic suspence.  Like that scene, FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE is a 
classic, knockout film, powered by strong performances, plot twists, and 
intrigue on a grand scale.  One of the best Bonds, and a perfect example 
of what the model should be for all other espionage films to come.  
Fantastic.

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
    What is freedom? How does one determine who is free? In 1839, those 
questions were more difficult to answer then they are now. Yet, the 
mistakes of our forefathers must be examined in order to rectify current 
situations.
That is, in essence, what Steven Spielberg's gripping drama 
"Amistad" is about. Through its various dramas, Spielberg presents a 
case about a group of Africans, who, after being seized from their home, 
were forced onto a ship and sent to the United States aboard "La 
Amistad". On their way there, the slaves, led by Cinque (Djimon 
Hounsou), rebelled, killing off part of the crew. However, the ship was 
still directed towards the United States, where the Africans were 
brought to trial under murder.
In the court, various factions claim ownership of the slaves, and 
therefore try to seize them away. The United States government, led by 
President Martin Van Buren (Nigel Hawthorne), and Secretary of State 
Secretary Forsyth (David Paymer), try to ship the Africans to Spain, 
where an 11 year old Isabella II (Anna Paquin) wants them back. The two 
Spaniards who own "La Amistad" want the slaves for themselves. The 
American ship that found the slaves also wants them. In the midst of 
this are two abolitionists (Stellan Skaarsgard and Morgan Freeman), who 
want the slaves to be free. They enlist the help of lawyer Matthew 
McConaughey, who tries to free them. Through various legal proceedings, 
the case appears before the Supreme Court, where it is argued by 
ex-President John Quincy Adams (Anthony Hopkins).
The film itself is a visual wonder. Spielberg favorite Janusz 
Kaminski sets the film in a dark, somber mood when appropriate, and a 
visual setting when appropriate as well. At times, the film is very 
slow, and very methodical. However, Spielberg is not at his finest here, 
because the courtroom scenes have a tendency to lag. The film is, in 
essence, a courtroom drama, one whose events are oversimplified.  The 
characterization is also weak, displaying weaknesses in building up 
characters such as the lawyer Baldwin (McConaughey), and especially 
Morgan Freeman's abolitionist.
But Spielberg's finest work in the film, the opening scene, a scene 
of Cinque's family, and the brutal voyage of the slaves to America, is 
altogether stunning. It is this emotional force that carries the film. 
McConaughey is superb as the lawyer defending the Africans, Hopkins is 
sensational as the old Adams, Freeman is outstanding when used 
(Spielberg vastly under uses his supreme talents), and the rest of the 
cast is stellar. The movie, however, belongs to Hounsou. His emotional 
intensity is brilliant. Spielberg manages to make even the slowest 
scenes sparkle with focus on Hounsou, and the film's extraordinary power 
is simply captivating. The film is flawed, for most of the supporting 
characters are merely cardboard. But that doesn't matter. The story is a 
gripping one, and one of extreme importance. Kudos to Spielberg for 
finding it, finding the right men for the job, and letting the audience 
listen to the words of Cinque. A good job all around.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Titanic
Starring Leonardo DiCaprio, Kate Winslet, Billy Zane, Kathy Bates, Gloria
Stuart, and Bill Paxton
Written and Directed by James Cameron
    After months of speculation and delays, Titanic was quickly becoming
1997's Waterworld.  Incredibly overbudget, and hopelessly ambitious
(accroding to the insiders), this film had no chance, with no A list stars,
and all that money spent for a 3 hour, 15 minute love story.
Forget the negative hype: Titanic almost lives up to its price tag, and
its one heck of a great film.  From the beginning, this film grips you like
no other modern-day romance has.  It literally begins from the end, as we go
through Titanic, now at the bottom of the ocean.  We are looking through the
eyes of fortune-hunter Brock Lovett, who hasn't experienced Titanic, until
he meets actress Rose Calvert (Stuart), who claims to be a passenger.
Rose tells her story from the very first day.  She was a woman named
Rose DeWitt Bukater (Winslet), whose family fortune is gone, and who is
being pressured into a marriage she doesn't want with a rich, powerful, and
unpleasant playboy named Cal Hockley (Zane).  Cal obviously wants Rose as a
trophy, and stops at nothing to get her.  He offers gifts by the dozen, he
gives her everything he has.  He courts her mother even more aggressively,
and the marriage is all but a done deal.
We also see our other main character, Jack Dawson.  Jack is a poor
artist, who manages to win his ticket onto the Ship of Dreams via a poker
game.  He is going home, to America.  Leonardo DiCaprio, in a role that
vaults him into stardom, plays this with an irrestible blend of charm and
exuberance.  We feel Jack's happiness, his dreams, and his life.
Rose, on the other hand, is a melancholy, depressed woman who is being
pressured into a world she doesn't want.  She makes a fateful attempt to
commit suicide, only to be stopped by Jack.  The two become close, and
during the course of a day fall in love.  Rose is trapped by her emotions,
and finally succumbs to Jack's charms.  On the fateful night, they are
together, and Rose declares her independence.
However, after the ship hits the iceberg, Cal, who is determined not to
lose his trophy, arranges for Jack to be arrested, and for Rose to come with
him.  As the ship sinks, Rose and Jack meet again, and they try desperately
for an escape, as both of them look to live and prosper together, as free
souls.
This may all sound like hackneyed Hollywood.  Believe me, it is.  The
dialogue is brilliant at times, and completely lousy at other times.
Cameron's writing is inane duirng much of the romance, and you get the
feeling this shoudn't work as a movie, despite a winning story.  But
DiCaprio and Winslet are irresistible.  Winslet gives the performance of a
lifetime.  She is brilliant, even better than the outstanding DiCaprio.
Zane plays his role with a nasty relish, and Kathy Bates, as the Unsinkable
Molly Brown, rounds out the superb supporting cast with a memorable
perfomance.  The cast makes the dialogue into gold.  You believe their
stories, you believe their fantasies.  So what if the character development
is lousy?  The acting makes up for it.  The details are so meticulously
drawn, the parties, the fun, the sheer pleasure of being young, of being in
love so much that nothing else matters, all of this contributes to a very
solid, very good romance.
Even then, the first 2 1/2 hours aren't great: they're merely very, very
good.  But Cameron becomes an inspired director at the end.  He is
frenetically brilliant, he directs with a passion, a fury, he crams an two
hours of anguish into one unforgettable hour of sheer fury, as he takes his
200 million dollar ship and violenty plunges it into the sea, taking 1500
people with it.  He matches his fury with the perils of the main characters,
blending in James Horner's beautiful music, contrasting the tragic beauty of
the supporting cast with the violence of the sinking.  The pity, the tragedy
hit the heart like nothing else. The little details, the playing of the
band, the children, the third class passengers, the commotion of the
sinking, all combine into a harrowing hour like nothing ever been done
before.  The emotional anguish of the sinking is still difficult to
describe.  The subtle touches, marked by brilliant performances by Victor
Garber and Bernard Hill as Thomas Andrews and Captain E.J. Smith are
wrenching.  The ending is simply devastating.  Nothing in film has prepared
you for this ending.
Cameron has created an epic that will live for a long time.  If only his
dialogue avoided cheesiness during the romance, this film could have been
one for all time.  As it is, the film is one of the best of the year.  Kudos
go again to DiCaprio, who will most certainly get an Oscar nomination, and
Winslet, who is the odds on favorite for best actress.  Horner's music is
something so emotionally captivating, it deserves best score of the year.
Bates and Stuart and marvelous, as is the underappreciated Billy Zane.
Frances Fisher, in her role as Rose's mother, is also very good.  Kudos also
to Jim Cameron, who had the will and the audacity to do something this
brazen and make it work.  This film is amazing.  Its not the best of the
year (L.A. Confidential's superb characters and plot are better), but damned
if its not the most emotional, and the most heart-wrenching.  This is
Hollywood entertainment at its very best.

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
    As I write the review for the new Hanks/Ryan romantic comedy YOU'VE 
GOT MAIL, I am acutely aware that I am typing it on a computer and 
sending it a billion miles away on the Internet.  I am also aware that I 
have just spent the last 2 hours watching the world's biggest paid 
commercial for America Online.  And I wonder: is that so bad?  Well, the 
commercial part is.  As for the movie, well, as long as I can watch Tom 
Hanks and Meg Ryan, I think I'll be okay.
To paraphrase James Berardinelli, whose reviews I admire very much, 
Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan can act.  They are both wonderful, but for all of 
Hanks' glorious work in serious films, such as his magnificent 
performance in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, and his glorious triumph in 
PHILADELPHIA, I like him best when he's suitably obnoxious.  Tom Hanks 
is wonderful when he is obnoxious in a romantic comedy when he's going 
to get the girl: the only question is how? 
Meg Ryan, America's high school sweetheart, can act.  She's had a 
handful of memorable performances, including the great scene in the 
diner in WHEN HARRY MET SALLY ( I must not mention what she does, due to 
the, well, um, you get the idea, and if you don't, get the movie-- 
fantastic).  But, I like her best when she's, well, perky.  She is so 
adorably perky/cute that together with Hanks, they are the most amazing 
onscreen duo in my short lifetime.  Some people have them going back to 
really old classic romantic couples, but I don't really know.  All I 
know is that I just like them both.  They have such wonderfully kinetic 
chemistry that's really hard to resist, and I'm not going to even try.  
They're just really, really cute, sweet, and charming.
Hanks and Ryan collaborate once again with Nora Ephron, who directed 
them in the megahit SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE.  Here, the setup is a little 
different.  Kathleen Kelly (Ryan) owns a small children's bookstore 
which her mother founded 42 years ago and passed down to her.  She is 
successful, beautiful, and dates a well-known columnist with very 
radical idea (Kinnear).  She is also having an affair, of sorts.  You 
see, Kathleen, with the handle SHOPGIRL, is secretly emailing NY152.  
They have a strictly un-detailed relationship: there are no specifics, 
and they have no idea who each other is. 
NY152 happens to be Joe Fox (Hanks), a multimillionaire bookseller 
who is the heir to the fortune of the Fox chain of mega-bookstores, run 
by his father (Coleman).  Fox Books has decided to open a store on the 
West Side, right across from a little children's bookseller named "Shop 
Around the Corner", run by a perky girl named Kathleen Kelly.  Every 
morning, these two email each other silly, and every day, they fight "to 
the death!!".  It's a charming premise, and one that works nicely, 
balancing the immense troubles Kathleen is in with the romance she wants 
to have.  It also has the great sense of being a classic romance: there 
is no "let's have sex tonight" mantra, if you'll excuse my bluntness.  
This is a solid romance built around that vague concept of love. 
Hmm.  Well, the movie goes through twists and turns, having some sad 
moments and happy ones, until at one moment Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan "hook 
up", to use modern terminology, and kiss their way into happiness.  You 
know it's going to happen, the question is now?  Thankfully, Ephron has 
a wonderful supporting cast with Posey, Kinnear, Chappelle, and a host 
of others, including a great scene involving brothers, aunts, and two 
sweet kids.  It's all cute and wonderful, and for all of the idealism, 
it makes me feel good.  Hanks is as obnoxious as ever on the outside and 
as warm on the inside as he always is.  He is, I believe, America's 
greatest actor.  Does he show it here?  Nah.  But he's still Tom Hanks, 
and she's still Meg Ryan.
Which is what this movie boils down to.  It's pure confection.  All 
the bits about THE GODFATHER, the jokes, the superb script, it's all 
really sweet.  There are some immense flaws, like pacing.  The last 
third of the movie really doesn't work as well as I would have liked, 
and for a romantic comedy, it's slow.  Once Hanks knows the secret, it 
gets really slow.  I even looked at my watch a couple times, to make 
sure Ephron was going to deliver the big onscreen kiss I was waiting 
for, so that I could get home at a reasonable hour.  The other problem 
is that this movie is shaping up to be really dated.  E-mail?  When my 
kids are my age, I don't know what we'll be using.  But Hanks can do 
more with one eyeroll than anybody, and Meg Ryan just loves to dive into 
a pillow better than anyone in movie history.  They just work together, 
and it's nice to see.  It gives you, well, a smile.  The script helps 
with some great lines that are absolutely hilarious, and that always 
come at the exact right time to keep the audience awake.
I was arguing with my father on the drive back home on what the 
purpose of movies was.  I've always believed that movies are very 
powerful, very powerful indeed.  You see, mankind has three abilities he 
needs to survive: the ability to think, entertain, and procreate.  
Movies can definitely do the first two, and as for the third, well, I'd 
rather not think about that.  I always thought films that made you think 
enlightened you and made you see something from another viewpoint, and 
that films that entertained you were good, because you forgot about your 
troubles and thought about something nice for a night.  And I was 
thinking about how incredible a year Tom Hanks has had.  Hanks was the 
driving force behind one of the year's best films in SAVING PRIVATE 
RYAN, which is one of those thinking films that truly made someone 
wonder about the world.  He's also half of the glue behind the year's 
best example of pure entertainment.  Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan are magical, 
as is this movie.  It's a sweet, lovely affair with a technology twist.  
It may be a long commercial, but it gave me a pretty big smile on my 
face.

Title
Review for Reversal of Fortune (1990)
    Did Claus Von Bulow try to kill his wife Sunny in their Newport 
mansion?  That is the question Reversal of Fortune asks you to consider 
as it opens in a hospital ward, with a comatose Sunny Von Bulow.  She is 
the main narrator of the film, in a narrative trick that was 
extraordinarily risky for Schroeder.  The dramatic trick works, as Sunny 
Von Bulow narrates a compelling story of murder, sex, unhappiness, and a 
lawyer's moral dilemma as he takes a case he thinks he cannot win.
Jeremy Irons is Claus Von Bulow, in what is his finest role, and one 
of the most devastingly evil performances in history.  He is as hated as 
any man alive, as cold as a cucumber.  His remorse for his wife's 
comatose condition is nonexistant, and it is no wonder that even his 
children have difficulty accepting his version of what happened during 
Christmas, 1980.
The background to the case is such.  During Christmas of 1979, Sunny 
Von Bulow fell into a deep coma from which she recovered and awoke.  The 
same situation occured in 1980, only Sunny never woke, and probably 
never will.  When examined, it was found that she had 14 times the 
normal amount of insulin within her blood.  Claus Von Bulow is then 
accused of attempted murder by his stepson, convicted, and freed on 
bail.  He immediately hires Alan Dershowitz, the renowed Harvard Law 
professor, to acquit him.   
Ron Silver is magnificent as a moral lawyer who cannot stand what 
has happened to him.  We follow him through two very different cases; 
the case of the Johnson case, where two innocent kids are standing on 
Death Row for a crime they didn't commit, and von Bulow, who he still 
hasn't figured out.  Dershowitz doesn't know what happened to Sunny, and 
he is extremely hesitant to take the case.  Nevertheless, he does, based 
on certain things which happen during the investigative process that 
deeply upset him.  Together with a group of law students, Dershowitz 
concocts a defense and ultimately get the verdict reversed. 
Silver's performance is one of a handful of solid roles in this deep 
film.  Schroeder directs on many different levels, with multiple plot 
lines which blend in wonderfully in the mind of Alan Dershowitz.  There 
are flaws; at times, the film gets overly theatrical.  Yet, due to Glenn 
Close's troubled and brutally honest performance as Sunny von Bulow, the 
use of her comatose body as a narrator works here fairly well.  The 
flashbacks are good, but at times Schroeder doesn't fill in the blanks.  
The movie could have benefited with the increased attention of certain 
developments during the film, and it could have used a better ending.  
The film progressed wonderfully before ending suddenly, without any 
intelligent conclusion.  The supporting characters are often neglected, 
and Dershowitz's team should have been allowed to grow character wise, 
but Schroeder over-simplifies the story and the characters.
Yet, for all these flaws, the film is deeply engrossing because of 
Irons.  As von Bulow, he is brutally evil.  Anti-Semitic, prejudiced, 
arrogant, protective, he is a rotten, lying monster, whose conviction 
may have been wrong legally, but morally he was to blame.  Irons plays 
him to a cold perfection, with pathetic attempts to gain moral support 
for his claims to innocence.  He is an adulterous liar and a cheat who 
in all likelihood committed the murder. 
However, the genius of Reversal of Fortune comes in its distinction 
between moral culpability and legal responsibility.  There is no doubt 
von Bulow is responsible for his wife's death by years of neglect and 
coldness.  However, legally, did he do the murder?  Schroeder dares the 
viewer to make up his own mind.  With all the character flaws, Reversal 
of Fortune is an engrossing puzzle because it is intelligent; he wants 
the viewer to make up his own mind.  Schroeder taunts the viewer with 
contradictory revelations, and then mentions that the answer to this 
compelling puzzle shall be revealed when we join Sunny von Bulow, in 
death.  For all the failed dramatic theatrics, this is one that works 
beautifully.  We don't know what happened.  That sense of legal 
ambiguousness, along with von Bulow's obvious moral guilt, is why 
Reversalf Fortune works.  In the end, von Bulow is as sadistic as ever.  
Irons is haunting, and that is why Reversal of Fortune is so good.

Title
Review for Usual Suspects, The (1995)
Starring Kevin Spacey, Stephen Baldwin, Benicio Del Toro, Gabriel Byrne,
Kevin Pollak, Chazz Palminteri, and Pete Posthelwaite
    In 1995, Brian Singer and Christopher McQuarrie dreamed up a simple
concept: the audience isn't stupid.  From that, they went on and created the
most plot-driven, intricately pieced movie in the last 25 years.  The
result: the Usual Suspects, one hell of a movie that redefines the word plot
twist.
    The story is convoluted, and is really confusing to read, although easy
to follow on screen.  Special investigator Kujan (Chazz Palminteri) grills
"Verbal" Kint (Kevin Spacey), a crippled con-man who is the lone survivor of
an LA boat explosion that claimed more than 20 victims. Kujan wants to
confirm that his nemesis, the rogue cop Keaton (Gabriel Byrne), is actually
dead. Kint relates the majority of the film in flashback, beginning with the
fateful day when five shifty guys meet in a police-station lineup in New
York City. Along with dour Keaton, Kint encounters cheerfully sociopathic
McManus (Stephen Baldwin), mordantly sarcastic Hockney (Kevin Pollak), and
Fenster (Benicio Del Toro), whose speech is virtually incomprehensible.
Together they plot to steal a small fortune in gems from "New York's Finest
Taxi Service"--crooked cops who provide escort service for visiting drug
kingpins. What follows is a shell-game of violence and betrayal, all hinging
on the identity of a mysterious villain called Keyser Soze.
    The film is brilliantly compact: its the shortest 90 minutes you'll ever
spend in a movie theater.  The cast is exceptional.  Palminteri shines, he
is brutally honest, a true cop, one who is going after the whole story
because its there.  Byrne is terrific, his brooding character, his
seriousness is needed to supplement the hysteria of Benicio Del Toro, who is
a riot as Fenster.  Del Toro is brilliant, his lines are a jumbled mess, you
can't understand a word the man says, but it sure is damn funny.  Baldwin is
also very good, he is careful, methodical, and cold, a chilling character
with a nasty streak of hot-blooded sarcasm.  Pollak is also terrific as
usual, a very good character actor.
    However, this will be forever known as the film that launched Kevin
Spacey.  Spacey is simply breathtaking, he is a force on screen, giving a
magnetic performance that jars the senses at the end of this twisting maze.
Spacey's performance will be remembered for years, for it is the best of his
career, it may be the best supporting actor performance in the last 50
years.  Verbal Kint is a clever storyteller, weak, oppressed, and gleefully
evil to the bone, yet pitiful, one who draws sympathy.  The film is a good
one, a decent film until the last 10 minutes.  What this film boils down to
is the greatest ending in cinematic history, for me at least.  The
revelation of Keyser Soze, the closing gunfights, it is something wondrous.
You have to see this movie about 10 times to believe what they do.
    Kudos to McQuarrie and Singer for giving the audience a delightful,
fast-paced, furiously plot-driven movie with quirky characters, phenomenal
acting, and some hilarious moments stuck in the middle.  McQuarrie refuses
to believe the audience is dumb.  Without furnishing too many details, he
concocts his story and lets it run, hoping the audience gets it at the end.
We do.  This might just be the finest cinematic puzzle ever created.  Kudos
also to Singer and John Ottman, who created the score.  They both create
what is a true film-noir setting, carefully setting up this intricate puzzle
until the final, jarring ending.  There are flaws: more questions raised
than answers, lack of character development, and no strong female characters
(save one).  However, the plot, and that stunning ending, make up for all
the flaws and more.
    If you haven't seen the movie, rent it.  Watch it.  Then rewind the
tape, and watch it again.  Trust me, you'll be amazed.

Title
Review for Shawshank Redemption, The (1994)
    All Hollywood films should be this good.  Without a doubt one of the 
most purely entertaining films in recent memory, THE SHAWSHANK 
REDEMPTION, stands out not as a good prison drama, a good drama, a 
well-written film, or anything of that sort.  It's not a distinguishable 
film, and indeed it may not be highly remembered in the annals of 
history, because its accomplishments have been done before.  That, 
however, would be a shame, because THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is one hell 
of a movie, and a fine example of pure Hollywood filmmaking.
The story is relatively simple: Andy Dufresne (Tim Robbins) gets 
convicted for two murders he didn't commit, and ends up in Shawshank 
Prison, where he languishes, having various adventures on the way.  He 
also meets Ellis Boyd "Red" Redding (Morgan Freeman), who helps 
him on the way, and sooner or later, becomes Andy's closest friend.  The 
two share an uncommon bond, and the film gradually explores the 
relationship of these two men.  Dufresne is forced to undergo the 
hardships of prison, but pretty soon overcomes his obstacles, and two 
men bond as Dufresne goes through a series of challenges along the way 
to the eventual ending of the film. 20
The performances of everybody, from Robbins and Freeman to character 
actors such as James Whitmore, are absolutely fantastic. I don't think 
I've ever seen Robbins or Freeman better, and they are certainly the 
highlights.  Whitmore, playing prison librarian Brooks Hatlen, makes a 
triumphant return to the screen in a superb performance that truly is 
etched in the viewer's mind.  Darabont directs with a sure hand, and has 
quite a few memorable moments writted in his screenplay, which is an 
outstanding work.  He lets his actors due their thing, focusing on them 
more than anything else, and lets this plot just develop.  It's a great 
thing to watch this one unfold.  The cinematography and brilliant score 
add to the feel of this film.  Film scores sometimes have the tendency 
to overwhelm the film, but this is a restrained piece of music that 
soars with the viewer's emotion.
You can complain about the "pleasantness" of prison.  You 
can complain about how the prisoners don't age at all during the film.  
You can complain about Darabont's tendency to show the viewers 
everything at all, about how his film may have too much dialogue, how it 
may be too long, or how you've just seen the film before a long time 
ago.  You can even say that it is highly derivative, with good 
performances, but a plot that has been time tested.  Hell, you could 
complain about anything in the world, for that matter.  I frankly don't, 
if you'll pardon the French, give a damn.  For me, and hundreds of other 
devoted fans, THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is one highly entertaining film 
that grabs the viewer, and brings him on a superbly paced journey into 
the land of hope.  The ultimate feel-good movie in a year of feel-good 
movies, and one of the best examples of pure entertainment, THE 
SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is gold.  Could it ever happen?  Probably not.  But 
"The Shawshank Redemption" reminds you that film is not meant to 
always be plausible.  Sometimes movies take you to another dimension, 
another world, where everything isn't supposed to make sense, but it 
does.  Sometimes movies are supposed to transport you to a time and 
place so great, you don't want to leave.  This is one of those movies.  
Simply amazing.

Title
Review for Last Temptation of Christ, The (1988)
    An astonishingly difficult movie to watch, THE LAST TEMPTATION OF =
CHRIST may be Scorsese's most important film, and yet his most =
impossibly abstract as well.  Scorsese presents the life of Jesus =
Christ, through Nikos Kazantzakis' novel, which details the life of =
Christ from approximately 20 until the day of crucifixtion.  Jesus of =
Nazareth (Dafoe) is a carpenter, who opens the film making crosses, so =
that he can escape the fate he is subjected to, his destiny on Earth.  =
Yet, he soon learns his evil ways for aiding in the deaths of others, =
and subjects himself to a desert in exile, in hopes that he can reach =
God.  Before leaving, he asks for forgiveness from Mary Magdelene =
(Barbara Hershey), a prostitute who is also a childhood friend of Jesus. =
=20
After going to the desert, Christ learns his true purpose in life, =
and what he must do.  Aided by Judas (Keitel), he sets off on teaching =
the world his message.  Along the way, he meets John the Baptist, the =
rest of the prophets, and tries to teach the world his message.  Christ =
is also confronted by internal demons and self-doubt, as he tries to =
find his true purpose throughout the entire film.  During the story, =
Judas is the closese ally of Jesus: his betrayal, argues the film, was =
not out of hate, but out of love, in order to allow Christ to die. =20
He is eventually captured, and crucified as per the Bibile.  =
However, as he is about to die on the cross, he is saved by a girl, who =
brings him to his marriage with Mary Magdelene.  The girl is a guardian =
angel who is from God, and who has saved him from his death.  Jesus goes =
on to live a life as a man, as a carpenter, and does not die on the =
cross.  On his deathbed, in the final moments of his life, he is visited =
by the prophets, and by Judas, who denounces his master for "not keeping =
his end of the bargain."  Judas reveals the angel to truly be the devil, =
and the life Jesus had lived to be the ultimate selfish act.  Jesus =
escapes from his deathbed, and asks his father for forgiveness, for =
succumbing to his last temptation.
Visually and aurally, the film is absolutely breathtaking.  No other =
director has even come close to realizing Jerusalem during the time of =
Christ's life to the screen.  Peter Gabriel contributes a score than is =
simply astonishing, with pulsing rhythms that capture the viewer.  The =
performances are simply exquisite, with Dafoe leading the way with a =
mesmerizing turn as Jesus.  Keitel, although his accent is a problem, is =
passionately brilliant, fighting through language to bring the character =
to life.  The visuals are also amazing.  Scorsese frames his movie in a =
harsh tone, leaving the impression that Jesus truly is a man who is =
having human frailties.
The film, though, has many trouble spots.  Paul Schrader's script is =
one.  Schrader uses modern-day New York English to tell the story, along =
with New York words, New York mannerisms, and New York slang speech.  =
The film also does not focus on the godly aspects of Christ.  There is =
no underlying message behind the man's words.  The film fails to capture =
the glory and splendor of Christ.  Had it faithfully explored that =
aspect, than the dichotomy of Jesus' soul, his frailties and doubt mixed =
with his unmistakable glory, would have been simply spectacular.  The =
message of Christ is confused between love and violence, and the film =
merely tells us Jesus is great, instead of showing us his greatness.
The film is also overlong.  It just drags in the middle, with =
nothing truly happening.  Christ is a confused figure, in the sense that =
the audience doesn't know who he really is.  Schrader forgets to give =
Jesus a message, to show that he truly is the Messiah, to give him the =
divinity.  Without that, he is a rambling prophet, who the audience =
themselves do not believe.  There are several moments of accidental =
hilarity, and most of them occur when Jesus is attempting to preach.  =
There are moments of brief awe and power, followed by moments of =
confused hilarity.
That said, the controversial Temptation sequence is something to =
behold.  It is a step in an unexpected direction, one that leaves the =
audience puzzled, until the arrival of the disciples.  It is a simply =
breathtaking scene, with Jesus about to die as a mortal.  It is truly =
one of Scorsese's finest moments.  It is unfortunate that Scorsese =
couldn't make a film about Christ as powerful as that one scene. =20

Title
Review for Jaws (1975)
    By now, the stories have become legendary.  In 1974, producers David 
Brown and Richard Zanuck, looking for a fresh young talent to helm the 
film adaptation of Peter Benchley's blockbuster novel JAWS.  They found 
a 28 year old Jewish kid out of California, who had directed a fantastic 
television movie named DUEL, and a respectable film debut in THE 
SUGARLAND EXPRESS, starring Goldie Hawn.  After engaging in numerous 
effects difficulties and time constraints, this young kid delivered a 
stunning, terrifying film to Universal, which proceeded to make it the 
biggest blockbuster in history to date, opening it in a record number of 
screens.  Zanuck reportedly was against this, saying he wanted people to 
"drive 100 miles to the theaters" to see this film.  The 
"kid's" name?  Steven Spielberg.
Spielberg has, of course, has had the most lucrative career in film 
history, and his first blockbuster has grown to mythic proportions.  
JAWS is often mentioned as the film which began the era of modern films: 
it originated the summer film, and created the demand for the "event 
picture".  It has also been mocked and ridiculed more than any other 
film in memory, probably because of the three campy, often atrocious 
sequels that followed it.
That's a real shame, because JAWS happens to be one of the most 
perfectly paced, marvelosuly written, and flawlessly executed 
experiments in audience terror.  From the horrifying beginning to the 
stunningly filmed climax, this is a study in how to scare the living 
daylights out of an audience.  Spielberg carefully hides his massive 
shark until about halfway through the movie, relying on sharp editing, 
music, sound, and images to convey the fear.  He also uses vast amounts 
of underwater shots, and places the film in a familiar locale.  The 
common theme throughout the entire first act of the film is of the 
terror that can creep into an ordinary situation.  There are moments of 
relieved tension, followed by exposition which introduce the basic 
characters, and give more details on this massive shark so carefully 
concealed from the audience.
What is so amazing about JAWS is that, first off, the movie 
dramatically changes course halfway through.  The setting changes from a 
cozy little island to a creaky ship forced to take on a monster of 
mythic proportions.  The film, in essence, becomes the modern-day Moby 
Dick, with the angry captain (Robert Shaw as Quint), the intelligent 
scientist (Richard Dreyfuss), and the scared passenger (Roy Scheider).  
It turns from a terrifying horror film into a chase: two bodies hurtling 
at each other, both willing to die in the process.  It's a stunning feat 
of filmmaking because the transition is so seamless.  Spielberg is able 
to scare the audience even then, because by that time, we have grown 
close to the characters, we can feel their every emotion through our own 
bodies.
Much of that credit goes to the excellent script.  There is that 
special human element to JAWS which all other horror films lack.  There 
are the friendships that are formed, the families that are introduced, 
and the feeling that these people, suffering on this island, are real.  
One of the most legendary shots is with Chief Brody (Scheider) eating 
with his son, next to him.  There is a terrific human interplay within 
this sequence, one Spielberg introduces to make the characters human.  
They are normal, everyday individuals.  Spielberg realized that in order 
for tension to exist, there must be a period of anti-tension, where the 
audience is allowed to relax, and let down their guard, before the next 
wave of terror. 
The performances in JAWS are absolutely astounding.  Scheider makes 
his career with a legendary performance that will be forever remembered. 
 Dreyfuss is gleefully superb, often carrying the middle portion of the 
movie with his scholarly antics and quick wit.  The last third is 
dominated by Robert Shaw, whose Quint fills the screen with the image of 
a man who's "talking about shaarrrkin'".  Lorraine Grey delivers 
a fine performance as Brody's wife, and the rest of the cast fills in 
admirably, carefully recreating a summer resort town.  There are 
hysterical moments of hilarity, placed beautifully in sequence as to 
elicit the desired response.
If anything, JAWS seems dated by comparison to today's movies.  
Bruce the shark is not as great as the hype, and the brand-new computer 
generated sharks are far superior.  But the film is still breathlessly 
exciting due to its lack of reliance on Bruce.  It instead relies upon 
the tension created by the presence of a man-eater, the character play, 
and the absolutely phenomenal score by John Williams, who delivers the 
most imitated, and yet most effective score in film history.  Spielberg 
places every component in flawless manner, and creates what is the 
definitive film of his early career, of the horror genre, and possibly 
of the 1970's itself.  The first true blockbuster, JAWS is simply 
exhilirating, even after all these years.  Wow.

Title
Review for Apollo 13 (1995)
    A cinematic tour-de-force, +ACI-Apollo 13+ACI- was not only one of 
1996's best films, but Ron Howard's critical and commercial 
breakthrough, as he found himself with universal acclaim for this 
extraordinary adaptation of Jim Lovell's true account on what happened 
on this doomed space flight.  Breathtaking in nearly every aspect, 
Apollo 13 succeeded in creating suspense and drama from a 
story that was already well-known, with breathtaking shots of space 
through excellent special effects work. 
Jim Lovell (Hanks) is a veteran space commander who is being 
rewarded for all his efforts for the NASA space program by being given 
command of Apollo 13, the 2nd flight after Neil Armstrong's historic 
moon landing in 1969.  By then, public interest had gone down in the 
space program, and many viewed the space mission as routine, until an 
explosion in the command module left the crew, Jack Swigert (Bacon) and 
Fred Haise (Paxton), in the middle of space with extreme obstacles in 
their way.  Leading the efforts to bring the men back is Ken Mattingly 
(Sinise), who was the original pilot for the ship until he was scrubbed 
for medical reasons, and mission commander Gene Kranz (Harris).  Along 
the way, the crew encounters many problems that endanger their lives, 
and procedures never attempted before, as they try to defeat the odds, 
and make it home.
   Apollo 13 also tells the story of the people back home.  
While telling the story in the skies, the film manages to show the 
emotional turbulences that happen within the ship, and within the Lovell 
household.  Marilyn Lovell (Quinlan), Jim Lovell's wife, tries to keep 
her sanity while managing a household full of children, whose father is 
far from home, and in perilous danger.  The film also tells the story of 
the men in NASA, who are working frantically to solve the crew's 
problems, while managing with their own eccentricities. 
The casting for the film is pure genius.  Paxton and Bacon give 
emotional power to their roles few would have thought possible, and 
Sinise builds on his stunning performance in Forrest Gump to 
create an emotionally torn, yet tough Ken Mattingly, whose feelings of 
resentment and concern are brilliantly balanced to play an integral part 
in bringing the crew home.  The centerpiece of the cast is the finest 
actor in Hollywood, Tom Hanks.  Through his pains, suffering, toughness, 
determination, cool, calm, and steadiness, we the audience feel ease.  
It is comforting to know that Hanks is piloting this ship+ADs- he has a 
calm quality that drives the film's emotional heart.  This is Hanks' 
film, and he pilots it with cool precision, as he gives the audience 
what he masterfully delivers everytime: a quiet everyman who gets the 
job done.  He draws the sympathy of the masses, and then drives this 
film home in the clutch.
This movie is an unqualified success.  Everything about it is 
pitch-perfect, from the acting down to the extraordinary special 
effects.  The script blends real news-clips with dramatic footage, 
placing the viewer in the year 1970 with brilliant success, even using 
comedy, romance, and dramatic cliches to perfection.  The score, made by 
James Horner, is also brilliant, heightening the suspense and drama in 
critical situations, and highlighting the emotional trauma of all those 
involved in the mission.
The special effects are simply astonishing.  From the liftoff to 
touchdown, every effect, every space shot has the same realism as the 
newsclips blended seamlessly into the film.  James Cameron's Digital 
Domain outdid itself with this splendid recreation of space travel that 
is simply a marvel to look at.  The scenes in space are visually 
astounding, especially the lunar sunrise.  Every shot made me want to 
travel in space, and look at these magnificent views of the world.  This 
film wasn't made of this Earth, the effects are so real it had to have 
been shot in space.
Howard's direction is brilliant.  From the ingenious cinematography 
and effects, to the comic undertones of the script, to the quick cuts 
that energize the film's decisive moments, everything about this film 
works.  Howard balances the many settings, the many characters, the 
technical jargon, the realism, the news-clips, and the vivid special 
effects with ease.  The performances just are simply outstanding, with 
Hanks delivering another knock-out.  There is nothing to dislike, 
nothing to even consider a flaw.  This is one of the finest pictures of 
the decade, and is destined to be one of America's most treasured 
accounts of a historical time-period that was traumatic and 
inspirational at the same time.  Designed to be a classic, Apollo 
13 is one of the finest dramas of our age, and firmly supplants 
Howard and Hanks as leaders in their respective fields.  One only wishes 
summer movies are always this good.  This is one hell of a movie.

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
    KUNDUN is Martin Scorsese's return to the somber religious overtones 
of THE LAST TEMPTATION OF CHRIST, and a film so unlike everything else 
he has ever done, including the film made preceding KUNDUN, CASINO.  
Using no Western actors whatsoever, Scorsese steps away from the 
boundaries of Western civilization, and instead makes a relatively small 
film about the Dalai Lama, the leader of Tibetan Buddhism, and one of 
the most revered figures in the world.
Leave it to Scorsese to give himself a challenge.  Scorsese was 
faced with the dilemma of making the culture of Tibet, a visual, aural 
treat that is so painstakingly detailed that some would find it boring, 
palatable to Western audiences.  Compounding his dilemma was the 
production of one SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET, a far inferior film starring 
Brad Pitt (though not as the Dalai Lama- that would have been 
interesting.)  Scorsese's film is about as far away from the Pitt movie 
as possible: it is slow-moving, much more visual, and more dependant on 
patience and images than on storyline. 20
The film's storyline is basically simple: it follows the life of the 
14th Dalai Lama from his finding at a young age to his escape into 
India.  His Holiness is played by four different monks, each of whom are 
excellent in their respective roles.  The youngest is probably the 
finest of the group, and he is without a doubt the highlight of the 
first act of the film.  The actors show a tremendous maturation as they 
progress, highlighting the growth of the Dalai Lama as he progressed in 
age.  In the latter part of the film, the Chinese invade Tibet, and 
Kundun, the ancient term for the Dalai Lama, is forced eventually to 
flee.
The script, written by E.T. scribe (and Harrison Ford spouse) 
Melissa Mathison, is not only slow in development, it is also highly 
philosophical and experimental.  There are several "dream sequences" 
which are often difficult to follow, and much of the film's power comes 
from its breathtaking visuals and score.  Scorsese lets the film develop 
without rushing into anything: his cameras are fluid, but not rapid.  
They are instead an hybrid of the NY style used predominantly by the 
famed director with a sort of reverent bathing of the Tibetan culture, 
creating an interesting dichotomy.  The visuals are at once personal and 
extravagant, leaving the viewer an impression not only of the film being 
a portrait of a man, but a portrait of a culture as well.
Several sequences are absolutely stunning.  One in particular 
involves Kundun standing in the middle of hundreds of monks, dead, as 
the camera pans back to reveal those the Dalai Lama could not predict.  
It is a deeply religious, deeply philosophical moment that reveres all 
which is non-violent, and abhores that whcih causes death and 
destruction.  Scorsese is quite passionate about his subject, and his 
dichotomy of spirituality and humanity is far better here than in LAST 
TEMPTATION. 20
The performances of all the players are exquisite.  The score, by 
Phillip Glass, is also outstanding.  The movie is, however, a 
challenging viewing, and the majority of the viewers will describe it as 
boring.  But for the chosen few, KUNDUN is a visual experience like no 
other.  With tremendous artistry, Scorsese is able to transport an 
ancient culture into the rooms of America.  There is so much beauty in 
even the most gruesome of sequences, so much power in the movements of 
its characters.  It is a slow-moving, sometimes tedious chore to listen 
to KUNDUN.  It is a deeply philosophical movie that can be interpreted 
as preachy.  But KUNDUN is truly none of those.  It is instead the 
ultimate acheivement in the mixture of art, beauty, sound, dance, 
culture, and history, not a film triumph as much as a culture triumph.  
KUNDUN may lack a significant plot or buildup, but it exhibits so much 
beauty, grace, and sheer devastation that it is nothing short of a 
triumph.  One of Scorsese's most challenging, most difficult, and 
ultimately, most rewarding films, KUNDUN is a true masterpiece.

Title
Review for Some Like It Hot (1959)
A miracle of filmmaking, "Some Like It Hot" is a brilliant film, and
maybe the foremost example of slapstick comedy brought to screen with
clever sight gags and plot twists.  It is the pinnacle of writer-director
Billy Wilder's career, a stunning feat considering the vast catalogue of
films he had helped make.
Jerry (Lemmon) and Joe (Curtis) are two stage musicians who go from gig
to gig, trying to earn enough money to feed themselves.  One night, as
they're playing at a banned Prohibition speakeasy, the place is raided.  As
it turns out, the owner, Spats Columbo (George Raft) was ratted out by
Toothpick Charlie (George E. Stone).  Several weeks later, on Valentine's
Day, Jerry and Joe go to a garage to pick up a car and end up witnessing a
gangland murder of Charlie by Columbo in a parking garage.  Eager to
escape, the duo are forced to take a job in Florida with all expenses paid.
 The only catch..its a girls band.  So Josephine (Curtis) and Daphne
(Lemmon), make their way onto the train and go to Florida.  On the way
there, they meet Sugar Kane (Monroe), a bombshell singer who is looking for
love.  Jerry and Joe immediately fall for the singer, but there's two
problems: 1) they're in drag, and 2) millionaire Osgood Fielding (Joe E.
Brown) falls madly in love with Daphne.  What follows in pure hysteria,
still complicated further by the arrival of Spats Columbo to Florida for
the "Italian Opera Lovers Festival".  
Tony Curtis is hysterical as Joe/Josephine, especially in his
preposterous attempts to woo Sugar.  Marilyn Monroe, in a wonderfully comic
performance, is Sugar, providing incredible timing and sex appeal, along
with true sincerity.  The scenes, however, are all stolen by either Brown
or Lemmon.  Lemmon is hysterical as Daphne. Cast as the less rational one,
Lemmon's performance is ridiculously crazy, it is disorder in the style all
Billy Wilder's.  Brown is particularly hilarious as Osgood, as we are
treated to the finest kind of comedic irony.  He manages to use Lemmon's
ingenious performance as a springboard for an even loonier performance as a
completely eccentric millionaire.
Every set-piece is flawless, as Wilder brilliantly changes settings
constantly, and uses every comic trick in the book to make his picture.
Wilder's script is stunning, as he carefully combines gangsters,
cross-dressing, romance, sex, music, gender roles, and social taboos in a
riotous blend of wit and oddball craziness.  Wilder manages to create
scenes of utter hysteria, so pitch-perfect that the audience is dying of
laughter with the last comic piece, the final line of this absolutely
incredible film.  Wilder's is dead wrong when he says nobody's perfect:
Billy Wilder is, especially when he makes something this disastrously
funny.  Nobody's perfect but Billy Wilder.  
  
RATING:  **** out of ****

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
    I have lived in suburbia for most of my life.  Most of the time I just
walk out the door, and walk to my car, and get in and not realize that
things are moving around me.  Things are actually happening behind me, but I
can never see them, because most of the time I really don't care.  AMERICAN
BEAUTY changed that perception more than anything else.  Sam Mendes'
astonishing debut is heartwrenching, hysterical, thoughtful, provocative,
controversial, and ultimately, the most rewarding and affirming movie of the
year.  And it very well could be the best movie of 1999.
Lester Burnham (Spacey) is tired.  He is tired of the pain he feels at
night, tired of the frustration at his family, his work, and at himself.  He
is not the man of hopes and dreams he once was.  He has, through the Reagan
Revolution and the age of capitalism, lost his soul, lost it in something in
no longer believes in anymore.  Lester probably has more in common with
Warren Beatty's delightful Jay Billington Bulworth in BULWORTH than any
other character ever created.  Like Bulworth, Lester is triggered into the
spirit of life by a woman.
The fact that she's a 17 year old cheerleader and classmate of Lester's
daughter Jane isn't the point, although it's a wickedly funny plot device.
The point is Lester's confrontation with beauty, and the beauty that exists
in the universe that he's been avoiding for so many years.  So, to the
dismay of his WASPish wife Carolyn (Bening), he starts to change.  He works
out.  He quits his job.  He smokes pot.  And he dreams, at night, of Angela
(Suvari).
But AMERICAN BEAUTY wouldn't work nearly as well as it does if this was
about Lester.  It's about the relationships we have with the people in our
lives.  And those people vary from our family to our neighbors to even
people we don't know but with whom we have a certain link to.  And all of
these are rich, probing characters in AMERICAN BEAUTY: all of these are
facets of the American culture that we inhabit.  Col. Fitts (Cooper) and his
drug-dealing son Ricky (Bentley) are one of them, and they are by far the
most interesting.  Others include the King (Peter Gallagher) and, to a
lesser extent, a gay couple played by Bakula and Sam Robards.
AMERICAN BEAUTY works so well, in fact, mostly because it's a comedy.
This is one hysterical movie, with gags all over the place.  But these
laughs hurt, because they are directed at us.  Lester Burnham is the neo
American hero, and as we mock his quest for independence we are ashamed at
laughing at him.  Some may object to his wild misbehavings, but the truth is
that no one can ever expunge 20 years of cultural domination over them
cleanly.  It takes a mad prophet to change the world, and Lester's my pick
for the next one.  Of course, to tell you more would be to ruin the glorious
ending of this film, where it stops being a good satire, and starts aiming
to be a classic masterpiece.
It would be an overblown statement to call this a masterpiece.
Certainly, despite the excellent script, there are kinks in the armor,
namely the over stereotyping of American subcultures.  But in the end, it
really does not matter.  The script decides to forego the middling material
it has and in the last hour, becomes the mad search for redemption in an
unforgiving world.  All of the characters, we realize, are looking for the
same thing: redemption.  And are not sure how in the world to find it.
It takes a gutsy performance to make this film work, and Kevin Spacey
gives it in the role of his career.  This is the role he has been working
towards all of his life: the summation of the state of America within a
character.  And he pulls it off in such dramatic fashion that it will be a
travesty if he is not awarded the Best Actor award at the Academy Awards.
Annette Bening is sensational, as are all the supporting players.  The movie
thematically seems to be sure of itself, but is not: it leaves a few holes
here and there, and may be too eager to force upon its themes to its
audience.  No matter.  For what its worth, this is a film that truly faces
the state of America today.  It reexamines beauty and its place in our
minds.  It is, truly, a beautiful work, one of the best of the year, and is
therefore fantastic in its implications.  The last act of this work is
downright astonishing, as is the far-reaching power of this film.  Mendes
shows a clear talent for imagery and brings alive a story that demonstrates
once and again the tremendous power of film.  A glorious achievement.

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT
A film by Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, and Simon Wells
With the voices of Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Michelle Pfeiffer, Helen 
Mirren, Sandra Bullock, Jeff Goldblum, Danny Glover, Steve Martin, 
Martin Short, and Patrick Stewart
    THE PRINCE OF EGYPT, the long-awaited foray by Dreamworks Animation 
(and its head, Jeffrey Katzenberg), is an ambitious, enthralling epic 
whose faults don't undermine the power of the film.  Despite its 
mediocre songs and its rushed story, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT has much to 
recommend, and is an overpowering addition to the animated genre.  
The story is relatively simple.  During the Egyptians' killing of 
all newborn children, a young child is sent down a river, in hopes that 
he will find a home that will care for him.  The young child grows into 
a man, Moses (Kilmer), and together with his brother Ramses (Ralph 
Fiennes), is quite a palace troublemaker, until lhe sees two people who 
remind him of his past.  From that moment, Moses leaves the palace, and 
goes to find his true self.  On the way to that, he finds a little more 
than that: a burning bush, and the voice of God himself.  Moses is given 
a mission: to free the Hebrew slaves from the grasp of the Egyptians.
The story is developed rather a little too quickly.  This film, more 
than any other, deserved the full movie treatment of animation.  I found 
myself asking why didn't Jeffrey Katzenberg take animation to the next 
level by making his movie 2 hours long?  It would have been a better, 
more complete story.  Instead, the miracles of God are rushed into a 
compact 20 minutes.  I found myself looking at my watch midway through, 
wondering when the Red Sea was ever going to be parted.  The first half 
is quite good.  The chariot race sequence between Ramses and Moses is 
excellent, and the animation throughout the entire movie is top-notch.  
It is certainly a gorgeous movie to look at.
The voices are superb, but the only two that register are the two 
that matter.  Kilmer and Fiennes are great, as are Goldblum, Bullock, 
and Pfeiffer.  The relationship between Kilmer and Fiennes is essential, 
however.  It has to work for the film to work, and the development is 
exquisite.  The film adds the guilt on Moses as Ramses' son dies.  Moses 
knows he had to go through his ordeals, but he sees his brother suffer, 
and it is difficult to watch.  It is a great moment in animation.  There 
are in fact many of those moments, the best probably being the burning 
bush, which is a great piece of work.
The score is actually pretty good, although the songs are pretty 
mediocre.  The first song, "Deliver Us",wasn't too bad, and neither was 
the second, "River Flow Gently".  Much of the latter half of the film, 
beginning with Moses' departure from Egypt, is told in episodic fashion, 
like Martin Scorsese's KUNDUN, in the sense that songs are merely 
episodes, and the movie moves from episode to episode, in almost blocks 
of 5 minutes, telling the story by visuals instead of dialogue.  It 
works for the most part, although some of the songs don't.  The big 
number by Martin and Short is a failure, mostly because it feels like 
something out of ALADDIN.  The song sung by Danny Glover's character, 
and Moses' future father-in-law is also something that didn't exactly 
sit well with me, although the sequence was very well done.  Come the 
last, rushed third of the film, there are merely glimpses of things I 
wanted to see more.  All of God's plagues are told in one 4 minute 
sequence, the plague of the frogs and locusts.  These were truly 
frightening and scary.  Yet, it felt rushed.  I wanted more of this, I 
wanted more of this terror, because that was what God was inflicting 
upon the Egyptians, and Pharoah himself.  Certainly, visual wise they 
were exquisite, but if more had been available, the film would have been 
even more devastating as far as impact.
Certainly, the Red Sea sequence, the Burning Bush, and the sequence 
where God takees all of the Egyptian first born, are all spectacular.  
There is some true uneasiness when God kills so many.  There is a 
strange dichotomy during all of PRINCE OF EGYPT.  On one hand, the film 
wants to extend the borders of animation.  It wants to be so great, that 
it often is.  The terrorizing sequences attest to that fact.  The 
character development between Ramses and Moses (the only two characters 
that are developed) is sensational, and the effects are magnificent.  
This is meant to be a very serious movie, and it delivers at the end.  
But throughout the film, there is a sense of making this one "for the 
kids".  As a result, things like Martin Short's and Steve Martin's 
characters, their ridiculous production number, some of the songs, and 
MIchelle Pfeiffer's character (who looks a little too much like Disney's 
POCAHONTAS), are really annoying, and angered me deeply. If Dreamworks 
had stuck to its guns instead of competing with Disney, they could have 
made the greatest animated film of all time.  Add about 1/2 hour to an 
hour to it, show what happens to the Hebrews with the Ten Commandments, 
and take out about half the songs, and this is one hell of a movie.  
Still, the mature last half, and the spectacular last 20 minutes make 
this a damn good film.  Dreamworks could have done more, but what they 
did was pretty good itself. 

Title
Review for It's a Wonderful Life (1946)
    One of the sweetest tales to ever be made, IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE 
isn't perfect, but its good natured charm and beautiful performances 
light up the screen with glorious results.  Probably the greatest 
"feel-good" film of all time, IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE aims for the heart, 
and strikes with a golden arrow.
On Christmas Eve, George Bailey (Stewart) is being prayed for by 
many in the small town of Bedford Falls.  You see, George is in trouble, 
and he has always helped others who needed it.  This one time, however, 
God answers his prayers, and sends down the lovable Guardian Angel 
Clarence (Travers) to try and save George.  Clarence has got his own 
problems, however.  Clarence is an angel without his wings, and each 
time the bell rings, the wings pass him by.  The Bailey case is a way 
for him to earn those magical wings and become a true angel.
But before Clarence can save George, he first has to go through a 
Cliffs Notes version of George Bailey's life.  We see George sacrificing 
his hearing to save his brother's life, sacrificing his college 
education to save the family business, sacrificing his dream of living 
far away to support his brother, and even sacrificing his life to make 
sure his brother is happy working somewhere else.  When the bank his 
family owns is in trouble, George gives away his honeymoon money to make 
sure the bank isn't sold to the evil Mr. Potter (Barrymore), who wants 
nothing less than to get the Baileys out of Bedford Falls.  One 
Christmas, Potter gets his chance.  Uncle Billy Bailey (Mitchell) loses 
$8,000 of the bank's money.  Without the money, the bank must close 
down.  George is stuck in a tremendous bind, and contemplates suicide.  
Clarence, the faithful servant, is there just to pick him up, and to 
show him what Bedford would be like without George.  This is all a 
lead-in to the very famous last scene, where George finally sees what 
true happiness is about.
IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE does have its faults.  The movie is beginning 
to feel dated in the details, especially in the treatment of women and 
men.  The sex roles in the film are weirdly out of place in the 90's, 
like something out of a revisionist look.  All the men drink too much 
and slap their wives too much during some portions of the film.  There 
are, however, endearing moments in all of this.  Capra puts in just 
enough humor mocking the sex roles of the 50's to make the movie 
remarkably enjoyable.  The story is hackneyed, and the ending feels, 
well, a little too sugarish.  There's this uneasy feeling of sugar over 
everything, especially the sequences where George is either in trouble, 
or helping somebody.  It's a little too nice for my liking, at times.  
There is, however, enough humor, enough wit, and enough of Jimmy Stewart 
to get the movie through the middle part, which would be the most 
difficult.  But watching IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE is never boring or 
difficult: it's always interesting, right until the finale, which, for 
all its sugar, makes delightful sense and is beautifully done.
Capra does have his monumental cliches, but the actors relish them 
and overplay everything to perfection.  Donna Reed is perfect as the 
loving, obeidient wife, and Lionel Barrymore is gloriously grump as Mr. 
Potter.  Everyone else is magnificent, including Bert and Ernie (Ward 
Bond and Frank Faylen).  There is a general sense of goodness, as if 
everyone in the film knows that they are making a great film, and they 
relish that.  Stewart, however, is the king of all of this.  He is 
sometimes awkward, especially when saying "Merry Christmas" to all 
objects, animate or inanimate.  But he is James Stewart, and he's 
lovably delightful throughout the film.
Have I complained?  I shouldn't have.  This is a really good movie.  
No, this is a great movie.  Better yet, this is a phenomenal movie.  
There is a reason classics are invented: to make sure that people will 
always have great movies to aid them in their quest for living life.  
This is one of those films.  It is a "feel-good" movie, something people 
complain a little too much about.  But Capra's reworking of "A Christmas 
Carol" is the greatest Christmas movie of all time.  There, I've said 
it.  I have to admit, the first time I saw this, I saw it with my 
family, including my 11 year old kid sister.  They all loved it.  They 
loved George, his wife, his troubles, and the beautiful ending.  Is it a 
little too sugar-coated?  Maybe.  No matter.  This is a film that should 
be watched time and time again, with families around a coffee table, and 
eggnog on the plate.  It is a film that just makes you feel good about 
life, family, and hope.  It is the perfect Christmas film, flaws and 
all.  It is Frank Capra's greatest acheivement, and that really does say 
a lot.  For about 121 out of 129 minutes, this movie is flawless.  The 
rest can be excused: no film is perfectly flawless.  I can't get over 
how much I love this movie, and how much you will, after watching it, 
digesting it, and sitting with your family, appreciating how special 
life really is.

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
    During "Primary Colors", I honestly wondered what this film's impact 
would have been if we had never heard of Monica.  That we did makes 
"Primary Colors" all the more powerful.  Despite major flaws, and holes 
at the end of this modern-day fable, the questions it raises about our 
moral state in politics today are without a doubt powerful and 
important.  The basic question Mike Nichols and Elaine May raise is 
this: what part does morals and character play in choosing our 
President? 
    John Travolta turns in a solid, albeit unspectacular, performance as 
Jack Stanton, a Democratic progressive candidate who has mastered the 
art of the game.  He is an impeccable candidate, with populist positions 
and an ability to inspire.  However, like every other character, he is 
extremely flawed, with serious womanizing problems and troubles in his 
past.  During one of his many campaign stops, he meets Henry Burton 
(Adrian Lester).  Henry is beginning to question the present state of 
affairs, and he wants to be inspired. 
    Henry and Jack are joined by Susan Stanton, the ambitious wife 
played perfectly by Emma Thompson.  They are the three who define this 
story, it is through their eyes that we see this story unfold.  Billy 
Bob Thornton is hysterical as Richard Jemmons, a campaign consultant, 
and Kathy Bates turns in a marvelous performance as Libby Holder, a 
private investigator hired to protect the Stantons from any dirt that 
might come at them.
    The story follows the primary races, as Stanton battles for the 
Democratic nomination.  His main rival is Lawrence Harris, a New England 
senator who is running on an economic platform that is gaining support.  
Stanton has to face all obstacles.  He is running against Harris, the 
press, his vices, and the past.  Early on, we see how Stanton uses lies 
and deceit to conjure up an emotional anecdote that connects with a 
group of voters.  We ask, is this so wrong?  Shouldn't a man appeal to 
his constituents, because he must be able to inspire them, to make them 
believe?  Stanton's beliefs are never in question.  His flaws are 
extreme, especially his womanizing, that which we are introduced to 
early and often. 
    The story follows Stanton and Harris, and is often a raucous comedy 
filled with humor to the extreme.  However, midway through the campaign 
Harris suffers a heart attack.  The man who takes his mantle is Fred 
Picker, a former governor of Florida who runs an idealistic campaign on 
the issues AND on the moral high ground.  He abhors campaign finance 
abuses, therefore, he runs no ads.  He abhors words, so he leads by 
action.  Picker's campaign sets off a deep contrast between he and 
Stanton, whose vices add up tremendously.  Slowly, Henry is forced to 
make difficult decisions regarding his life, the people he loves, and 
the ideals he adheres to. 
    "Primary Colors" isn't a brilliant film.  The beginning is flat-out 
hysterical, but the comedy dies down when the movie becomes more of a 
character drama/study.  It is unevenly paced, too long, and simply 
boring at some parts.  Yet, it is also deeply emotional, it triggers 
responses which generate questions on the system of affairs today.  
"Primary Colors" just might be the most important film of the year 
because of what it shows about ourselves.  It is a mirror to our 
society, displaying our faults as people, and displaying the state of 
affairs in our nation.  It is not about the Presidency.  In the end, it 
is about ourselves.
FINAL: *** out of ****
Flawed, but important and entertaining nonetheless

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
Starring: Kevin Spacey, Russell Crowe, Guy Pearce, James Cromwell, Danny =
DeVito, Kim Basinger, and David Straithern
    Stop reading this review right now.  Quickly shut down your 
computer, and leave to go see L.A. Confidential.  Then see it again.  
Are you back?  Good.  Now we can talk
    What I have just done is send you on one of the best film-rides in 
the last 25 years.  Welcome to Curtis Hanson's "L.A. Confidential", a 
tribute to the great film noirs like Roman Polanski's "Chinatown".  If 
possible, LAC might be even grittier than Chinatown.  Hanson sets up a
brutally honest, savagely entertaining ride through a convoluted plot 
that is so confusing it makes perfect sense, with a cast so fabulous 
they deserve to sweep the Oscars. 
    "L.A Confidential" is not the best movie of the year.  It's the best 
5 movies of the year.  The plot revolves around two cops, Bud White and 
Ed Exley (the absoulutely amazing Wonders from Down Under: Russell Crowe 
and Guy Pearce).  White is a brutal tough-guy, a man who basically 
punches who is bosses tell him to punch, a loyal, fiercely honest cop 
with a hatred for wife-beaters.  Exley is the son of a heroic detective, 
he is a brilliant, ambitious cop with a flair.  The story essentially 
begins when a bunch of Mexicans are brought into the station.  The 
police take their racism into their jobs by brutally beating the 
suspects, in an incident found on the front-page of the paper.  White 
and another police officer, Jack Vincennes (the incredible Spacey) are 
implicated in the beatings, but no police officer is willing to give 
corroborative testimony....but Exley.  This results in Exley being 
promoted, and he also being the butt of everyone else's hatred.
    There's one storyline.  Here's another.  Gossip king Sid Hudgeons 
(Danny DeVito) pays Vincennes and gives him tips on how to arrest major 
stars committing crimes.  In exchange, Vincennes makes big arrests on 
the front page of Hush-Hush, Hudgeons' magazine.  Vincennes is also the 
technical advisor on Badge of Honor, a Dragnet-like show.  Vincennes 
therefore has to constantly worry about his image, as he is a rising 
star, a national celebrity in the making.  Spacey plays this role to 
absolute perfection, his glamorous smile and flamboyance are flawless.
    That's two.  I told you L.A. Confidential had 5.  Here's the major 
one, numero 3.  A prominent businessman is having plastic surgery done 
to girls to make them look like movie stars.  It turns out this 
businessman is a high-class pimp, with these girls as his celebrity 
prostitutes.  All of these plots link to a murder at the Nite Owl Coffee 
Shop, where White's partner is killed.  There are dozens of other plots, 
all connecting into one hell of a convoluted mess, which shouldn't work. 
    Not only does this movie work, it is a mindbending spell of a film.  
The line between good and evil is blurred beyond repair.  Hanson places 
his story in a dirty, wild atmosphere of pure crime.  James Cromwell, as 
both White's and Exley's boss, is simply astounding as Captain Dudley 
Smith.  Kim Basinger makes the role of her career as prostitute Lynn 
Bracken, a Veronica Lake lookalike.  The Wonders from Down Under are 
simply that: wonders.  Crowe and Pearce are simply amazing.  Spacey is 
his usually brilliant self.  His sheer confidence carries his role.  
Every plot-line comes together in this gritty, vividly entertaning film. 
 Everyone is pitch-perfect, the casting is stunning, and the direction 
is flawless.  Hanson and Brian Helgeland's script is stunningly 
captivating, with its intricate plotlines all combining to form one hell 
of a movie.  I can't think of any flaws.  L.A. Confidential may suffer 
solely from its excessive brutality and sex, but in a way, its 
absolutely needed.  LAC shows us a dirty time, in a dirty world, with 
crap infiltrating every life.  It's gorgeously done to perfection.  
Hollywood hasn't been this good in a long time.  This is the best film 
of the year. 

Title
Review for Apocalypse Now (1979)
    It is with hesitance that I call "Apocalypse Now" a masterpiece.  
Certainly, it had the pedigree to be one of the greatest films ever 
made, with a director known for producing masterpieces with ease, and 
some of the finest actors of the 1970's.  The plot, an adaptation of 
Joseph Conrad's "Heart of Darkness", was set in Vietnam, and the timing 
of the film was supposed to be brilliant, coming on the heels of the end 
of the war.
"Apocalypse" certainly has its moments, some of which are the finest 
in film history.  The plot is fairly simple.  Captain Willard (Sheen), 
is a troubled soldier who came back to Hanoi for a 2nd tour of duty.  
His mission is simple: take a boat up to Cambodian territory, and 
destroy the command of renegade Colonel Kurtz (Brando) "with extreme 
prejudice".  Along the way, Willard runs into a series of adventures, 
including one with Lt. Col. Kilgore (Duvall), and a strange encounter 
with Playboy bunnies.  Willard' s four person crew finally make it to 
Kurtz' compound, where he discovers Kurtz has set himself up as a god 
among the natives.  Willard's experiences with Kurtz take up the last 
half-hour, with a confrontation and eventual ending.
The movie is visually breathtaking.  The battle scenes are 
exquisitely done, and the score is brilliant, setting a murky mood of 
darkness that is first-rate.  The collage of disturbing images that 
Coppola presents is at times both astonishing and sickening.  The vast 
amount of detail poured into every war scene is stunning, and there are 
many episodes that are deeply powerful which resonate through the entire 
movie.  The journey to Kurtz' camp is quite a ride, with psychosis 
setting in on almost every character.  The most interesting one is 
Kilgore, the Lt. Col. who cares more about the surf than about the 
mission.  It is at times revolting, psychotic, and incredible, and it is 
one hell of a movie.  The scenes are bold, inventive, and powerful, and 
the acting is stunning, especially be Sheen, Duvall, and Fishburne.  The 
narration is exquisite, as is the mystery of Kurtz.  Coppola sets about 
a hallucinatory ride through Vietnam, kind of like "Saving Private Ryan" 
on LSD.  The film is jarring in its implications, and psychotic in its 
execution.
The problems come when the film slows down.  One of the major scenes 
in the film, where the boat arrives at the final Army checkpoint before 
they start their search for Kurtz, is a colossal mess.  The dialogue is 
confusing, the lighting is atrocious, and the scene drags on for 10 
terrible minutes of film.  The true problems happen after the crew does 
come into the Kurtz compound.  The film slows down to a drag.  Sheen 
seems forever captured by a madman, played by Brando is a lazy 
performance that is not deserving of the accolades it received.  Brando 
is in the film for no more than 15 minutes, but is bathed in shadows the 
entire time, making the last half hour of the film visually pathetic.  
The scenes are poorly done, the dialogue is muffled, and the whole mess 
is utterly confusing beyond all belief.  Sheen seems to adore this man, 
but why the viewers are never told.  The entire journey is supposed to 
be a prelude for a stunning entrance of this god-like Kurtz, but the 
scenes fall way short of expectations.  Granted, it has its moments, 
which are brutally horrific, but the general feeling is one of 
confusion.  Brando mumbles his lines in a incoherent stir, and my 
feeling was that this could never be a great man, this could never be a 
man who inspires hundreds to follow him, so why do they do it?  There 
are moments of brilliance, but the visual confusion dilutes the power of 
the scene.  There are too many questions left unanswered with the 
character of Kurtz to have a satisfying ending.
The finest scene at the end is Sheen's escape, and his entrace into 
the temple.  His rise out of the water, with the smoke coming off of his 
slicked head, is a brilliant 30 seconds of film.  Yet, you cannot shake 
the feeling that there is so much more this film could have done.  The 
psychotic ride is unforgettable at times, and indeed the film on the 
whole is very good.  It is a stunningly flawed expression of film, for 
it addresses major issues, such as man's mental stamina during bouts of 
war.  But one still cannot shake the feeling that this film could have 
so much more powerful, had the character of Kurtz been more explored, 
and had Sheen truly succumbed to the fate that the viewer thought he was 
destined for.  There is too much good material in here not to be called 
a masterpiece, but it could have been so much more rewarding.

Title
Review for Usual Suspects, The (1995)
Starring Kevin Spacey, Stephen Baldwin, Benicio Del Toro, Gabriel Byrne,
Kevin Pollak, Chazz Palminteri, and Pete Posthelwaite
    In 1995, Brian Singer and Christopher McQuarrie dreamed up a simple
concept: the audience isn't stupid.  From that, they went on and created the
most plot-driven, intricately pieced movie in the last 25 years.  The
result: the Usual Suspects, one hell of a movie that redefines the word plot
twist.
    The story is convoluted, and is really confusing to read, although easy
to follow on screen.  Special investigator Kujan (Chazz Palminteri) grills
"Verbal" Kint (Kevin Spacey), a crippled con-man who is the lone survivor of
an LA boat explosion that claimed more than 20 victims. Kujan wants to
confirm that his nemesis, the rogue cop Keaton (Gabriel Byrne), is actually
dead. Kint relates the majority of the film in flashback, beginning with the
fateful day when five shifty guys meet in a police-station lineup in New
York City. Along with dour Keaton, Kint encounters cheerfully sociopathic
McManus (Stephen Baldwin), mordantly sarcastic Hockney (Kevin Pollak), and
Fenster (Benicio Del Toro), whose speech is virtually incomprehensible.
Together they plot to steal a small fortune in gems from "New York's Finest
Taxi Service"--crooked cops who provide escort service for visiting drug
kingpins. What follows is a shell-game of violence and betrayal, all hinging
on the identity of a mysterious villain called Keyser Soze.
    The film is brilliantly compact: its the shortest 90 minutes you'll ever
spend in a movie theater.  The cast is exceptional.  Palminteri shines, he
is brutally honest, a true cop, one who is going after the whole story
because its there.  Byrne is terrific, his brooding character, his
seriousness is needed to supplement the hysteria of Benicio Del Toro, who is
a riot as Fenster.  Del Toro is brilliant, his lines are a jumbled mess, you
can't understand a word the man says, but it sure is damn funny.  Baldwin is
also very good, he is careful, methodical, and cold, a chilling character
with a nasty streak of hot-blooded sarcasm.  Pollak is also terrific as
usual, a very good character actor.
    However, this will be forever known as the film that launched Kevin
Spacey.  Spacey is simply breathtaking, he is a force on screen, giving a
magnetic performance that jars the senses at the end of this twisting maze.
Spacey's performance will be remembered for years, for it is the best of his
career, it may be the best supporting actor performance in the last 50
years.  Verbal Kint is a clever storyteller, weak, oppressed, and gleefully
evil to the bone, yet pitiful, one who draws sympathy.  The film is a good
one, a decent film until the last 10 minutes.  What this film boils down to
is the greatest ending in cinematic history, for me at least.  The
revelation of Keyser Soze, the closing gunfights, it is something wondrous.
You have to see this movie about 10 times to believe what they do.
    Kudos to McQuarrie and Singer for giving the audience a delightful,
fast-paced, furiously plot-driven movie with quirky characters, phenomenal
acting, and some hilarious moments stuck in the middle.  McQuarrie refuses
to believe the audience is dumb.  Without furnishing too many details, he
concocts his story and lets it run, hoping the audience gets it at the end.
We do.  This might just be the finest cinematic puzzle ever created.  Kudos
also to Singer and John Ottman, who created the score.  They both create
what is a true film-noir setting, carefully setting up this intricate puzzle
until the final, jarring ending.  There are flaws: more questions raised
than answers, lack of character development, and no strong female characters
(save one).  However, the plot, and that stunning ending, make up for all
the flaws and more.
    If you haven't seen the movie, rent it.  Watch it.  Then rewind the
tape, and watch it again.  Trust me, you'll be amazed.
